ARYABHATIYA 
OF 
ARYABHATA 
WITH THE COMMENTARY OF SURYADEVA YAJVAN 
WAL SGIER 
NATIONA 
ONGEA 
Edited By 
ACADEMY 
K. V. SARMA 
HONG VA 
सवितर्वरेण 
INDIAN NATIONAL SCIENCE ACADEMY 
NEW DELHI 
In the history of science in India, Aryabhața I (born A.D. 476), who made notable con tributions to the development of astronomy and mathe matics, has a distinct place. In bis Aryabhati ya he remo delled the prevalent system of Indian astronomy on a scientific basis, provided it with modified parameters, new tools and techniques, and more accurate methods of calculation. A large number of expositions and works based A V AD WATIVA on the Aryabhatiya came to be composed in later times, leading to the evolution of WITH THE COMMENTARY OF the Aryabhatan School of SŪRYADEVA YAJVAN astronomy and mathematics. 
The present volume com prises a critical edition of the Aryabhatiya 'with the eluci dative commentary of Surya deva Yajvan (b. 1191), based on original palmleaf manus cripts 
An informative Introduc tion and several Appendices have been added to facilitate the study of the book by modern students of mathe matics and astronomy. 
Price : 25/ 
(In India) $ 8; £3 (Outside India) 
ARYA BHATI YA CRITICAL EDITION SERIES PUBLISHED ON THE OCCASION 
OF THE CELEBRATION OF THE 1500th BIRTH ANNIVERSARY OF 
ĀRYABHATA 
2nd November, 1976 
Pt. 1. Āryabhatiya, Cr. ed. with Introduction, English translation, 
Notes, Comments and Appendices By Kripa Shankar Shukla in collaboration with K. V. Sarma 
Pt. 2. Āryabbatīya, with the Commentary of Bhāskara and Somes 
vara, Cr. ed. with Introduction and Appendices By Kripa Shankar Shukla 
Pt. 3. Aryabhatiya, with the Commentary of Suryadeva Yajvan, 
Cr, ed. with Introduction and Appendices By K. V. Sarma 
Handbook on Aryabhata Āryabhata-Indian mathematician and astronomer, By K. S. Shukla 
TONAL 
We 
. 
VAX AS 
www 
NV 
INDI 
INDIAN NATIONAL SCIENCE ACADEMY 
NEW DELHI 
ĀRY A BHATIYA 
OF ARYABHATA WITH THE COMMENTARY OF SŪRYADEVA YAJVAN 
Critically edited with Introduction and Appendices 
By 
K. V. SARMA Acting Director, V.V.B.I.S. & I.S. 
Panjab University, Hoshiarpur 
HAL SCIEN 
ATIONAL 
INDIAN 
WM 
ACADEM 
w 
1 
INDIAN NATIONAL SCIENCE ACADEMY 
NEW DELHI 
I Published for THE NATIONAL COMMISSION FOR THE COMPILATION OF HISTORY OF SCIENCES IN INDIA 
by 
The Indian National Science Academy Bahadur Shah Zafar Marg, New Delhi-1 
Indian National Science Academy 
1976 
EDITORIAL COMMITTEE Chairman : F. C. Auluck Secretary : B. V. Subbarayappa Member : R. S. Sharma Editors : K. S. Shukla and K. V. Sarma 
Printed in India At the Vishveshvaranand Vedic Research Institute Press 
Sadhu Ashram, Hoshiarpur (Pb.) 
FOREWORD 
Aryabhața (b. 476 A. D.) occupies a prestigious position in the history of Indian astronomy and mathe matics. In view of his important contributions, particularly to astronomy, he has been rightly regarded as the founder of scientific astronomy in India. His works, namely, the Aryabhatīya, which is available in its original form, and the Aryabhața-siddhanta which was epitomised by Brahmagupta in his Khanda-khad yaka, were hailed as works par excellence. The 1500th birth anniversary of the great astronomer and mathematician is being celebrated from November 2-4, 1976 under the auspices of the National Commission for the Compilation of History of Sciences in India set up by the Indian National Science Academy. The Academy is grate ful to the esteemed Prime Minister of India, Shrimati Indira Gandhi, for graciously agreeing to inaugurate the celebration on November 2, 1976. 
In commemoration of this occasion, the Indian National Science Academy is releasing the critical edition of the Aryabhatīya in three parts : 
Part I : Text with English translation, notes and com 
ments, along with introduction and appendices. Part II : Text with the commentary of Bhāskara I and 
Someśvara, along with introduction and 
appendices. Part III : Text with the commentary of Sūryadeva Yaj 
van, along with introduction and appendices. 
It is hoped that these volumes will serve as books of reference to scholars interested in the field. On behalf of the Indian National Science Academy, I offer my sincere thanks to Drs K. S. Shukla and KV. Sarma for their scholarly and painstaking work in preparing these volumes for the Academy. 
B. P. PAL 
President 
Indian National Science Academy New Delhi, 15-10-1976 
1 
CONTENTS 
Page 
xvii 
C10 
xvii 
xx 
. 
xxi 
xxiii 
D 
] 
xxiii 
XXY 
XXV 
xxvii 
xxviii 
FOREWORD INTRODUCTION 
1. Critical apparatus 
1. Manuscript material 2. Reliability of the manuscripts 3. Mutual relationship of the manuscripts 
4. Stemma codicum 2. Editorial principles 3. Textual presentation 4. Süryadeva Yajvan 
1. Personal details 2. Date of Suryadeva 
3. Saryadeva's provenance 5. Works of Suryadeva 
1. Known works 
2. Chronology of the works 6. Aryabhatīya-vyākhyā 
1. Nature of the work 2. Notable points 
1. Date of Aryabhata 2. Dasagītika and AryaşțaśataTwo works 3. Identification of the Ten gītikas 4. Traditional verses 5. Use of the Kațapayādi notation 6. Automatic gola-yantra 7. Verification of a computational system 8. A discrepancy of Lalla explained 9. Justification of the number of Rsines as 24 
xxix 
xxix 
XXX 
xxxi 
xxxi 
xxxi 
xxxii xxxiii xxxiii xxxiii 
Xxxiv 
Xxxiv 
XXXV 
viii 
ARYABHATIYA 
Page 
XXXV 
... 
xxxvi 
xxxvi 
XXXVI 
10. Division of the Yuga 11. Position of Ujjayini 
· 12. Motion of the stars and the planets contrasted 
13. The nodes and apogees 14. Use of Śiva, a unique measure denomination 15. Lord of the civil year 16. Solstitial motion of the School of Sūryadeva 17. General remarks 
Xxxvii 
" 
" 
" 
. 
xxxvii xxxviii 
.. 
. 
xxxix 
. 
.. 
. 
. 
xxxix 
.. 
xlii 
xliii 
11. 
xliii 
xliii 
xliii 
xliv 
7. Laghumānasa-vyākhyā 
1. The work 2. Its date 
3. Aim of the commentary 8. Jātaka paddhati-vyākhyā 9. Commentary on the Mahābhāskarīya-vivarana 10. Mahāyātrā-vyākhyā 
Khandakhādyaka-vyakhyā 12. Sūryadeva's method of exposition 
1. Presentation of the background 2. Critical approach 3. Astronomical instruments and diagrams 4. Some peculiarities 
5. Astronomical and astrological authorities cited 13. Yallaya and his Supplement to Suryadeva's commentary 
1. Personal details 
... 2. His works 3. Nature of the supplementation 
... 4. Supplementation on Conjunction of Planets 5. An auxiliary work 
6. Weights and measures 14. Acknowledgements 
xlvi 
xlvi 
xlvi 
xlvii 
xlix 
xlix 
CONTENTS 
. 
+ 
1 
गीतिकापाद: 
(GITIKA SECTION) व्याख्यातुरुपोद्घातः (Introduction by the Commentator) valfagrirata fanit: (Divisions of the science of Jyotişa) Brincafeau: (Account of Aryabhata) 
मङ्गलाचरणम् (Invocation) sealfarate frut (Method of writing numbers) CEMİ OHITOTT: (Revolution numbers of Planets in a 
yuga) walaanga: (Rev. numbers of Apogees etc.) 
ETTİ #THT: (Rev. numbers of Planets in a Kalpa) कक्ष्यायोजनप्रमाणम् (Measure of the orbits in yojanas) 
TratautsagamA (Orbital diameters of Earth etc. in 
terms of yojanas) 19*: (Inclinations of the Planets to the ecliptic) qarala 1T: (Longitudes, in degrees, of the ascending 
nodes and apogees) Hranítstlsaqarfa (Manda and Śighra epicycles) भूवायुकक्ष्याप्रमाणम् (Circumference of the terrestrial 
wind) #EITUT: (Rsines) दशगीतिकापरिज्ञानफलम् (Benefit of the study of the Ten 
Gitikä-satras) 
गणितपादः 
(MATHEMATICS SECTION) 
मङ्गलाचरणम् (Invocation) FourSAT: Ferra a (Nomenclature of numbers and their 
notation) A.B.S. ii 
... 
33 
ARYABHATIYA 
Page 
38 
३७ 
वर्गस्वरूपम् (Square) gafaEq# (Cube) वर्गमूलम् (Square root) घनमूलम् (Cube root) त्रिभुजक्षेत्रफलम् (Area of a Triangle) घनत्रिभुजक्षेत्रफलम् (Volume of a Right pyramid) वृत्तक्षेत्रफलम् (Area of a Circle) धनगोलफलम् (Volume of a Sphere) faqaaated: 412977 (Areas of Trapezium etc.) सर्वक्षेत्रफलम् (Area of any Plane figure) ZUTATENEU FAT (Chord of one-sixth of a circle) aarafefa-cara HTT(Circumference-Diameter ratio) sarafaqal (Geometrical derivation of Rsines) CUEFAT: (Rsine differences) qarfaafarqat (Geometrical construction of Circle etc.) staafa#F#. (Diameter of any desired Circle) 
Feed (Gnomon and Shadow) wifegat (Base and height in gnomon and shadow 
problems) kut: (Hypotenuse-sides relation) FUTTE: (Square on half-chord) शरानयनम् (Arrows of intercepted arcs in intersecting 
circles) sia (A. P. Series) 
78917974 (Number of terms in an A. P. series) hefaangaanny (Sum of the sum of an A.P. series) *** winnat: ferah (Sum of squares and cubes of an 
A. P. series) राशिद्वयस्य संवर्गे उपायान्तरम् (Product of two numbers by an 
alternate method) 
16 
CONTENTS 
Page 
1 
+ 
1 
राशिसंगर्वाद राश्योरानयनम् (Calculation of two numbers 
from their product and difference) मूलफलम् (Principal and Interest) áttfera (Rule of three) fwratif (Rule of three involving fractions) भिन्नानां सवर्णाकरणम् (Reduction of fractions to a common 
denominator) curafafa: (Method of Inversion) 
(Total of all unknown quantities from sums of 
all but one) अव्यक्तमूल्यसमीकरणम् (Unknown quantities from equal 
sums) प्रहान्तराद् ग्रहयोगकालः (Time for conjunction from the 
distance between two planets) कुट्टाकारगणितम् (Pulveriser) 
कालक्रियापादः 
(SECTION ON THE RECKONING OF TIME). 
#tafa m: (Time divisions) 
fami: (Circular divisions) TEUTT: (Conjunction of Planets) ouatara: (Vyatīpata) उच्चनीचादिपरिवर्त: (Anomalistic and Synodic revolutions 
of planets) ITITET: (Jovian year) सौरचान्द्रादिमानम् (Solar, Lunar and other measures of 
time) अधिमासावमदिनानि (Intercalary months and Omitted 
days) संवत्सरप्रमाणम् (Measure of the year) 
xii 
ARYABHATIYA 
Page 
**99#TĄ (Measure of the Kalpa) serfaunifafanu: (Division of the Yuga into Utsarpini etc.) *** आर्यभटीयप्रणयनकाल: (Date of composition of the 
Āryabhatiya) Iniuri**T: (Beginninng of the Yuga etc.) VETTİ Aanfaat (Equality in the motion of the Planets) *** VETTI Naarai hartaraq (Equality of the motion of the 
Planets in yojana-measure) ग्रहाणां कलात्मकं भिन्न गतित्वम् (Non-equality of the motion of 
Planets in circular measure) **01#A: (Relative positions of the planetary orbits) Eterfaataferar: (Lords of the day, hour etc.) DE AFFIT: (Nature of the motion of the Planets) प्रतिमण्डलसंस्थानम् (Set-up of the Eccentric circle) स्फुटमध्ययोरन्तरम् (Distinction of True motion from Mean 
motion) ग्रहभ्रमणप्रकारः (Nature of the motion of planets on the 
eccentric circle) atatsaaa #ETTE: (Mean planet on the epicycle) Hrastanut: wafafa: (Addition and subtraction of 
Mandaphala and sīghraphala) 
... प्रहस्फुटानयनम् (Computation of True longitude in the case 
of superior planets) garwal: 292: (True longitude of Mercury and Venus) UE WATE12A1 (Disquisition on the motion of the Planets) *** भूताराप्रहान्तरालम् (Distance between of the Earth and the 
Planets) 
. 903 
*** 
908 90% 
90% 
900 
908 
990 
99€ 
CONTENTS . 
xiii 
Page 
गोलपादः 
(SECTION ON THE CELESTIAL SPHERE) 
११८ 
१२२ 
१२३ 
१२४ 
. 
. 
. 
१२७ 
१२६ 
१३० 
. 
. 
१३० 
१३१ 
१३१ 
गोलबन्धः (Armillary sphere) अपमण्डलम् (Position of the ecliptic) अपमण्डलचारिणो ग्रहा: (Planets moving along the ecliptic) विक्षेपमण्डलं ग्रहाणां पाताश्च (Planetary orbits and ascending 
nodes) चन्द्रादीनां उदयास्तमयः (Rising and setting of Moon etc.) प्रहादीनां प्रकाशहेतुः (Reason of brightness of the planets) भगोलावस्थानम् (Situation of the Earth) भूगोलपृष्ठे प्राणिनिवासः (Position of living beings on the - Earth's surface) कल्पे भुवः वृद्धिह्रासौ (Increase and decrease of the size of 
the Earth in a Kalpa) भूभ्रमणम् (Earth's rotation) मपञ्जरभ्रमणम् (Rotation of the Celestial sphere) मेरुप्रमाणम् (Size of the Meru mountain) मेरुबडवामुखावस्थानम् (Situation of Meru and Badava 
__mukha) लङ्कादिचतुर्नगर्यः (The four cities, Laika etc.) लडोज्जयिन्योरवस्थानम् (Situation of Lanka and Ujjayini) ...। मचक्रस्य दृश्यादृश्य मागौ (Visible and invisible portions of the 
Celestial sphere) भचके देवासुरदृश्यप्रदेशः (Portions of the Celestial sphere 
visible to the gods and the demons) देवादीनां दिनप्रमाणम् (Measure of the days of Gods etc.) .. खगोलकल्पना (Conception of the 'Sphere of the sky') .." प्रष्ट्य शाद् गोलकल्पना ('Sphere of the sky' with reference to the 
observer) 
१३२ 
१३र 
३४ 
१३६ 
१३८ 
१३८ 
१४० 
१४१ 
riv 
ARYABHATIYA 
Page 
૧૪૧ 
१४३ 
१४४ 
१४६ 
१४७ 
१५० 
१५२ 
१५४ 
१५६ १५७ 
१५८ 
वामण्डलं दृक्क्षेपमण्डलं च (Vertical circle and the vertical 
circle through the central ecliptic point) गोलभ्रमणोपाय: (Automatically rotating armillary sphere) .. अक्षज्या लम्बकश्च (Rsine latitude and Rcosine latitude) स्वाहोरात्रविष्कम्भ: (Diameter of the day-circle) लङ्कोदयप्राणा: (Right ascensions of the signs at Laika) क्षितिज्या चरज्या च (Earthsine and Sine ascensional 
difference) 
"" स्वदेशराश्युदयः (Risings of the signs at the local place) इष्टकालशकुः (Rsine altitude at desired time) श वग्रम् (Distance of the planet's projection on the 
horizon from the rising-setting line) अर्काना (Amplitude of the Sun) समशकुः (Rsine of the Sun's prime vertical altitude) मध्याह्नशकुः (Rsine of the Sun's altitude at midday) दृक्क्षेपज्या (Rsine of the zenith distance) ETITIFTI (Rsine of the arcual distance of the zenith from 
the central ecliptic) आक्षदर्शनसंस्कारः (Visibility correction for latitude) आयनदृक्कर्म (Visibility correction for declination) ग्रहणस्वरूपम् (Nature of eclipses) TEUTFIT: (Time of occurrence of an eclipse) भूच्छायादय॑म् (Length of the Earth's shadow) छायाबिम्ब: (Earth's shadow-circle) frezart: (Half-duration of a lunar eclipse) fanafujta: (Half-duration of totality of a lunar eclipse)". प्रस्तप्रमाणम् (The part of the Moon eclipsed) 
१५६ 
१६० 
१६४ 
१६७ 
१६८ 
१६८ 
१६६ 
१७० 
१७१ 
१७३ 
१७५ 
CONTENTS 
" 
Page 
१७७ 
१७८ 
१८० 
FCFAOTA: (Part of the Moon eclipsed at any time) 
आक्षवलनम् आयनवलनम् च (Deflections due to latitude and 
declination) ग्रहणवर्णः (Colour of the Moon during eclipse) सूर्यग्रहणे विशेषः (Speciality for the solar eclipse) प्रहादीनां दक्संवादः (Observational correlation of the planets) ... शास्त्रमूलम् (Source of the work) उपसंहारः (Conclusion) 
१८१ १८२ 
१८३ 
१८४ 
APPENDICES 
१८७ 
I. Index of half-verses and key passages II. Index of authorities cited 
III. Index of quotations 
१९४ 
१९५ 
TA 
ROMAN TRANSLITERATION OF DEVANAGARI 
VOWELS 
Short : 
अ 
इ 
उ 
ऋ 
लु 
Long : 
आ ई ऊ ए à i ū e 
ओ 0 
ऐ औ ai au 
Anusvara : 
- 
m 
: 
= 
॥ 
CONSONANTS 
Classified : 
क् ख् ग घ ङ् k khag ghi च् छ् ज् झ् ञ् c ch j jh ñ 
A. 
t त् t 
th थ् th 
d द् d 
dh 
ध् dh 
ņ न् n 
e 
p 
ph 
b 
bh 
m 
Un-classified : य 
र 
ल 
व 
श 
ष 
स 
है, 
- A 
s 
Compound : २ 
ks 
व ज trji 
INTRODUCTION 
The present volume, issued as Part III of the Critical Edition of the Aryabhatīya, carries the textual verses of Aryabhata with the commentary called Bhata-prakašika by Suryadeva Yajvan (b. A.D. 1191) who belonged to Gangāpuri or Gangaikonda-Coļapuram in South India. Suryadeva's commentary, which is published here critically for the first time, attempts to present a compact exposition of the Aryabhatīya. It is a commentary which is neither too discursive nor all too-brief, which can be expected to give a fair idea of the views of Aryabhata on mathematics and astronomy. 
1. CRITICAL APPARATUS 1. Manuscript material 
The present edition of Aryabhatīya and Suryadeva Yajvan's commentary thereon is based on five mutually independent palm leaf manuscripts, all of which are reliable and complete. All of them are inscribed in the Malayalam script and are deposited in the Kerala University Oriental Research Institute and Manuscripts Library, Trivandrum. All the mss. contain both the text and the commentary. The brief descriptions of these manuscripts given below are intended to draw attention to their physical features and internal characteristics. 
A. Ms. No. C. 224-A, described in the Descriptive Catalogue of Sanskrit Mss. in the Curator's Office, Trivandrum, Vol. IV, pp. 1355 ff., under Cata. No. 641-A. A modern transcript of this manu script is available in the Library under No. T. 24. The present work is the first in a codex of astronomical works procured from the scholarly royal house of the erstwhile principality of Edappalli in Central Kerala. The ms. contains 75 folios, 30 cm. x 4 cm., with 9-10 lines a page and about 50 letters per line. The ms. is legibly inscribed but no scribe is named. It is well preserved and presents a generally reliable text. There is no mention, at the end of the work, of the date of trans cription, but another work in the codex, being Tantrasangraha of Nīla kantha, gives the date of its transcription, in a post-colophonic state ment, as Kollam era 928, equivalent to A.D. 1753. This date might be taken as the date of the present Aryabhatiya ms. as well. A post colophonic statement to the last work in the codex, Siddhantasekhara, 
A.Bu.S. iii 
xvii 
vint 
, ARYABHATIYA 
pays obeisance to God Ganapati, the tutelary deity of the original owner of the ms., viz. the Raja of Edappalli. 
The works contained in the codex are : A. Aryabhatiya with the com. of Suryadeva-yajvan; B. Laghubhaskarīya of Bhāskara I; C. Tantrasangraha of Nīlakantha Somayājin; D. Mahabhaskariya of Bhaskara I; E. Suryasiddhanta ; F. Goladipika of Parameśvara; and G. Siddhantasekhara of Śrīpati. 
B. Ms. No. 5957-B, procured from the scholarly family of Vațţappalļi Matham, śucindram, near Kanyakumārī in Tamilnadu, 72 ff., 35 cm. x 4 cm., 9 lines a page with about 40 letters a line. The writing is very legible, inked and revised. The leaves do not look old, certainly not older than about a hundred years. In continuation of the work, the ms. contains two extraneous pieces of astronomical matter, at the end of which a date for the completion of transcription is mentioned as Kollam era 941, meşu-masa, 24th day, Thursday, Parvaşadha, Uttarapakşa, (gap)-tithi, forenoon. The blank space for the tithi would imply that the said date does not apply to the present ms., for the scribe who knew all the other details cannot fail to know the tithi as well, and the comparatively recent appearance of the manuscript confirms that this date should have been that of the original manuscript from which it had been copied : the spot where the tithi had been written in the original should have been damaged in that ms. and hence a gap is shown in its place in the present manuscript. 
The codex contains another work catalogued as ‘A. Aşgadhyayı sutranukramani', being an alphabetical index of the sutras of Pāņini's Aşpadhyayî, with the adhyaya, pada and satra references noted against each entry. 
C. Ms. No. C. 2320-A, described in the Des. Cata. of Skt. Mss. of the Curator's Office, Trivandrum, Vol. IV, pp. 1362-63, under Cata. No. 643-A, 84ff., 50 cm. x 4 cm., with 6 to 8 lines a page and about 60 to 70 letters a line. The ms. had been procured from the private collection of a namputiri brāhman, by name Agni Śarman Bhajțatiri. It is very carefully inscribed in a readable but unshapely hand. The lines in this long palmleaf ms. are especially straight and well spaced out. The ms. has an oldish appearance and the leaves have been darkened by age and are extremely brittle. The rounded corners and the enlarged string-hole caused by the frequent drawing of the string against the leaves attest to the profuse use to which the manuscript has been put, obviously, for study. The scribe is mentioned, in a post-colophonic statement, as Rama, the scion of a royal family. Cf. 
xis 
INTRODUCTION - WTA Terardat afarroa ET ATI लिखिता रामनाम्नाऽद्य मया नृपतिजन्मना ॥ 
The codex contains one more work, being no. 2320-B, Kusa lavopakhyanam, in 12 chs., from the Afvamedhikaparvan of the Jaimini bharata. This is followed by a detailed account of the expenses incurred and the materials used for the Ankurārpaņa ceremony at a festival at the temple of God Śrīvallabha at Tiruvalla in South Kerala, in Kollam era 711 (=A.D. 1535). Cf. its beginning: Kollam 71 1-ntam Mithuna-ñayiru 21-am tiyati astamiccu Tiruvalla Vazhamatilakattu mula ittatinu ezhutiya kanakku. The account is incomplete and exhibits a few lacunae indicating that what we have here is only a copy of the accounts copied from a defective original which was, obviously, dated in M.E. 711 (-A.D. 1536). 
D. Ms. No. C. 2475-A, described in the Des. Cata. of Skt. Mss. of the Curator's Office, Trivandrum, Vol. IV, pp. 1365-66, under Cata. No. 644, 59 ff., 30 cm. x 5 cm., with 13 lines a page and about 45 letters per line. The writing, though close, is very legible and attractive. The ms. has been inked and revised at least twice, the first revision having been inked and the second uninked. The original from which this ms. has been copied should have contained a large number of breaks and omissions, for all of which space has been scrupulously left by the scribe of the present ms. The ms. is not dated but the folios are mellowed by age and use; it cannot be less than a hundred years old. This ms. too belonged, originally, to the royal library of Edappaļļi in Central Kerala. 
The works contained in the codex are : A. Aryabhatiya with the com. of Suryadeva Yajvan ; B. Aryabhatiya text, upto Gañita, 2. 
Then follow a few miscellaneous tracts including some astronomi cal constants for the year Kollam 1009 (=A.D. 1834). Possibly, the ms. belongs to this period. 
E. Ms. No. C. 2121 C and D, described in the Des. Cata. of Skt. Mss. of the Curator's Office, Trivandrum, Vol. IV, pp. 1577-79, under Cata. Nos. 729 C and D, 54 ff., 35 cm. x 6 cm., with 13 to 14 lines a page and about 50 to 55 letters a line. The ms. is inked and revised and the writing is very readable. It belonged originally to the private library of a family of astronomical scholars, the Mangalappalli Illam, at Aranmula, in southern Kerala, 
( ARYABHATIYA 
The works contained in this astronomical codex are: A. Maha bhaskariya of Bhaskara I; B. Mahabhaskarīya-vyakhya (Prayoga racana); C, Aryabhati ya with the com. of Suryadeva Yajvan, Girikapada; D. Aryabhatīya, Ganita, Kalakriya and Gola padas; E. Laghumanasakarana of Muñjala, with an anon. com. Vivarana ; F. Pāțīgaạitasara (Trišati) of Śrīdhara; G. Suryasiddhanta, ch. II and a portion of ch. III, com. by an anonymous author, son of Bhava and pupil of Yogīndra ; cf. the colophon: 
इति योगीन्द्र शिष्येण भवपुत्रेण धीमता । व्याकृतः सूर्यसिद्धान्ते द्वितीयश्च स्फुटाभिधः॥ 
H. Suryasiddhanta, in 13 chs. ; I. Rāmayana-gadyam, anon. 
Three more inanuscripts of the commentary of Suryadeva Yajvan on the Aryabhatiya, preserved in the Government Oriental Manuscripts Library, Madras, being Mss. Nos. 13390, 13392 and 13393, the last with the supplement of Yallaya to Süryadeva's commentary, were examined for possible use in the present critical edition. It was however found that each of these manuscripts was replete with all types of scribal and intrinsic errors, including omissions, gaps, wrong trans criptions, textual corruptions etc., and, so, was utterly unreliable. These manuscripts could not, therefore, be used in the present edition. 
2. Reliability of the Manuscripts 
In consonance with ms. A having, originally, been prepared for the scholarly royal family of Edappaļļi, it has been transcribed by an apparently reliable scribe and the text preserved herein is generally correct. Scribal errors and confused writing, exclusive to A, are rare, though not absent. However, there are a good number of haplographical omissions, some of which are exclusive to A, and the others which it shares with mss. B and C. In view of the otherwise reliability of the manuscript, these, exclusive omissions have to be attributed to the original manuscript from which A has been copied. 
Ms. B too presents a generally reliable text. While scribal errors are comparatively few, it contains a large number of minor and major omissions of different types, haplographical, indicated and unindicated, most of which, if not all, have to be traced to its original. These omissions, indeed, detract, to some extent, from the value of the manuscript, 
INTRODUCTION, 
Ms. C, which has the distinction of having been prepared by a scholarly prince Rama (Varman), again, presents a generally reliable text, in spite of there being a few exclusive variants, errors, omissions of the haplographical and unindicated types, and repetitions. But from the careful manner in which the manuscript has been written, these defects have, mostly, to be traced to the original from which it has been copied. It might be noted that C shares several peculiarities in readings with A and B. 
Ms. D, a fine specimen of a manuscript, which also belonged to the royal family of Edappaļli, contains a fairly accurate text. A long omission occurs in the beginning and several minor ones towards the middle, all being scrupulously indicated by blank spaces. Exclusive errors, haplographical omissions and unindicated omissions are few, but not absent. The ms. contains also a number of unique variant readings, minor additions, transpositions, elaborations and, what is more important, supply of the omissions in A.B.C, some of which it shares with E. 
Ms. E, found in a codex of astronomical works, preserves a generally correct text akin to that in D, but also often differing therefrom. It exhibits a large number of peculiarities of its own, including unique variants, blanks, haplographical omissions, unindicated omissions, errors and transpositions. Notwithstanding these limi tations, the manuscript is, on the whole, reliable. Other differences in E include unique additions, supply of omissions in other mss., and a large number of minor elaborations to expressions in A.B.C, some of which are common to D and E. 
3. Mutual relationship of the Manuscripts 
The individual traits, including exclusive variant readings, haplographical omissions, transpositions, gaps and errors, which characterise each of the manuscripts described above indicate the impossibility of any one of them having been directly copied from any other, thus ruling out any immediate relationship and establishing their independent nature. However, some of the manuscripts bear certain common features which would enable their being classified into versions. 
Version 1. The three manuscripts A, B and C exhibit some telling similarities. Apart from certain special readings and common omissions, these three manuscripts preserve identical errors and 
1, Vide p. 62, note 4 ; 70.2 ; 73.10 ; 85.12 ; 101.1 ; 119.12, 
IIii 
"ARYARHATIYA 
haplographical omissions which clinch the point. There is also at least one instance of a common reading in a textual verse, while the commentary explains not this reading but a variant thereof. These common features indicate that these manuscripts belong to one version and are descended froní an exemplar thereof which contained the above-noted haplographical omissions and inexact readings. 
Version II. In the same manner, it can be seen that manu scripts C and D represent another version characterised by common readings as opposed to A-B-C littered on practically every page of the present edition. Common omissions and gaps found in them also point to the same conclusion. A peculiar feature of these two manuscripts is that, at places, they present apparently revised forms or simpler elaborations of difficult or unexplained passages.3 Version II is, there fore, a later, slightly revised form of the commentary. It is important to note that often they serve in filling the common haplographical and other omissions in A.B.C* and also help in correcting the errors therein.5 
Sub-versions of II. While both D and E are slightly inflated versions in which a few explanatory passages have been added and simpler and effective readings have been substituted, these changes are not always identical. This would mean that these two manu scripts have to be taken as two sub-versions of an expanded version, postulated here as version II. The differences between D and E are not confined to mutually different readings, but extend to either of them retaining the original reading of A-B-C,6 offering additions, explanatory or otherwise," making omissions and, in an instance or two, giving entirely different commentaries of the textual verses. Obviously, the 
1. Vide 63.6 ; 64.2 ; 69.10 ; 73.3 ; 81.5; 99.11 ; 110.4 ; 149.16. 2. See 173. 1974 1. 3. See 20.2 ; 107.1 ; 108.1; 141.11 ; 142.3. 4. See 55.4 ; 65.6, 12; 68.2 ; 69.10 ; 99.11 ; 110.4; 113.11. 5. See 63.4; 70.2 ; 73.5, 10; 85.12 ; 149.12 ; 157.8 ; 162.3. 6. Vide 65.3 ; 91.6; 111.19, 22 ; 152.4. 7. See 14.1; 51.13 ; 99.4 ; 130.2; 132.7. 8. See 48.10, 11 ; 106.10 ; 107.7. 9. See 13.15; 918. ; 185.2, 
INTRODUCTION 
txiii 
two sub-versions, represented, respectively, by D and E, have branched off from version II at a lower stage in the descent of the manuscripts. 
4. Stemma Codicum 
An interesting point worth mentioning here is that despite the numerous differences that are found in the manuscripts, they all preserve a few common haplographical and other omissions (e.g., see 25.6, 51.11), errors (39. 4, 138. 4TH 3), corruptions (96.9, 126.3, 180.1) and confusions (153.4). All these manuscripts have, therefore, to be traced back to a common original which had been defective, at least, at these places. This defective archetype has, obviously, to be different, and, considerably, removed from the author's autograph. 
Giving due consideration to the individual traits and common characteristics of the manuscripts described above, their descent can be represented by the following genealogical table : 
(Author's original) 
(Defective archetype) 
(Sources of the versions 
I and II) 
X, 
X, Xg. 
(Sources of our mss.) 
A 
B 
C 
D 
(The present mss.) 
2. EDITORIAL PRINCIPLES The generally accepted principles of textual criticism have been sought to be applied carefully in preparing the present critical edition of the Aryabhatīya and its commentary. While all the manuscripts used are complete and present a more or less reliable text, their indi vidual merits and division into versions and sub-versions have been given due consideration in the reconstruction of the critical text. The broad principles followed in the editorial work might be indicated here. 
1. It has already been noted that Version II is a slightly inflated form of Version 1. The latter, comprising of mss. A, B and C, has therefore, been taken to represent the basic text. There, too, after a careful examination of their accuracy, the three manuscripts of this version have been arranged in the descending order of their 
*tiv 
ARYABHATIYA 
fullness and accuracy and designated, respectively, as A, B and C. In version II, the less inflated exemplar has been taken as the first sub version and designated D, and the more inflated one as the second sub version and designated E. 
2. Version I, being the basic text, has been taken as the primary basis of the present critical edition. When the readings of its exemplars A, B and C, differ from one another, those readings in one or more of these, which accord with the readings in version II are adopted. 
3. Version II comes into play, mainly, in filling the gaps and supplying the haplographical or other omissions in version I. 
4. Manuscripts D and E of version II have been effectively used also where passages in A, B, C, are, apparently, erratic, confused or corrupt. In such instances, preference has generally been given to that reading of A, B or C which accords with or seems to give rise to the readings in D and/or E. 
5. As an extension of principle 4 above, in such rare instances where the readings in D and/or E seem to be the original ones, as apparent from the context or the style of the author, those readings are given preference in constituting the critical text. 
6. In a small number of cases where the readings of all the mss. were unsatisfactory or there was a common gap or uniform lacuna, emendations have been suggested editorially, these emendations being given within square brackets.1 
7. There has been instances where the reading of a textual verse in an exemplar is different from that explained in the commentary, In such cases, that reading which has been accepted in the commentary has been uniformly adopted. Thus, the text of the Aryabhati ya presented in this edition can be taken to be that version followed by the commen tator Suryadeva Yajvan. 
8. The variant readings occurring in the different manuscripts have been duly presented as footnotes below the critical text of the karika-s and the commentary. All pertinent manuscript peculiarities 
1. For such editorial emendations, see p. 25, line 6, 51.11, 113.12, 126.3, 153.5. 
INTRODUCTION 
. 
IIV 
have also been similarly presented. Minor scribal errors, broken letters etc. have, however, been silently dropped, following accepted editorial practice. 
3. TEXTUAL PRESENTATION For the sake of continuous reading, Aryabhata's karikas and Suryadeva Yajvan's commentary thereon have been presented in the following pages in one sequence, the textual verses being set in bold type. 
The commentary does not abound in citations from earlier works, but in the case of the citations that do occur, due efforts have been made to trace them to their sources. 
The numerical figures that occur in the commentary have been duly verified and wherever the manuscripts do not give the numbers they have been calculated and added within brackets. 
Conventional punctuation marks like the comma, colon, semi colon, hyphen, dash, quotation marks etc. have been freely incorporated into the running commentary in order to facilitate comprehension by modern readers. 
: Subject headings have been supplied to the several topics dealt 
Helpful folio headings have been supplied indicating the names of the sections and the topics dealt with in the corresponding pages. The relevant verse numbers have also been indicated at the top of the pages. 
4. SURYADEVA YAJVAN 
1. Personal details 
In his different works, the name of Sūryadeva is suffixed with the surname Sari,' Yajvan or Somasut. While the term sūri refers to 
HVL1 
1. Cf. fa #TaTi ottaa: osaan groot 
अनेन गीतिसूत्राणामर्थान् पश्यत पण्डिताः।। 
(Colophon to com. on Aryabhațīya, Gitika-päda) 2. Cf. fffretejfaat #itf grida 17491 संक्षिप्यार्यभटप्रोक्तसूत्रार्थोऽत्र प्रकाश्यते ॥ 
(Intro. to com, on Aryabhasiya) A,Bh.S. iv 
twi 
ARYABHATIYA 
bis scholarship, the other two terms indicate that he had performed the Vedic Soma sacrifice (soma-yāga). Suryadeva should have earned these appellations during his early years, definitely before he wrote any of his available works, all of which mention these surnames. He was a brāhmana of the Nidhruva-gotra' and, as such, should have belonged to the Bodhāyana-sUtra, his pravara-rsi-s being Kalyapa, Avatsara and Naidhruva. 
Suryadeva does not make any mention of his parentage, but specifically refers to his maternal uncle, Suryadeva, as his promotor : 
इत्थं मानसकरणं व्याख्यातं सूर्यदेवसोमसुता। श्री-सूर्यदेवनाम्नो मातृभ्रातुः प्रसादेन ॥ 
(Col, to the com. on Laghumānasa) The expression prasādena used by Suryadeva to specify the benefit which he had received from his maternal uncle in the matter of composing bis elaborate commentary on the Laghumānasa seems to imply that he was a student or protégé of his uncle. 
इत्थं मानसकरणं व्याख्यातं सूर्यदेव-सोमसुता । 
(Conclusion of com. on Laghumanasa) In a manuscript of the work (D. 13390, Govt. Or. Mss. Library, Madras), the colophons to the Gitika and Kalakriya pādas relate to him the expression Dikșita which has the same meaning as Yajvan. Cf. : इति सूर्यदेवदीक्षितीये आर्यभटीयव्याख्याने दशगीतिका समाप्ता and इति सूर्यदेवदीक्षितीये मार्यभटीयव्याख्याने कालक्रियाप्रकाशः समाप्तः । 
___1. Cf. his verses : 
• इत्थं निध्वगोत्रेण सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना । कृतं जातकपद्धत्या दृष्टयध्यायार्थवर्णनम् ॥ 
(Col. to ch. ii of his com. on Jatakapaddhati) 
(See also col. to chs. iii, viii of the same work) इत्थं निध्रुवगोत्रेण सूर्य देवेन यज्वना । मानसप्रथमाध्यायवासना सम्यगीरिता ॥ 
(Col. to ch. I of his com. on Laghumanasa) इति निध्रुव-सूर्यदेव-सोमसुद्-विरचिते मानसवासनाप्रकाशे त्रिप्रश्नाध्यायः समाप्तः । 
(Col. to ch. II of his com. on Laghumanasa) 
INTRODUCTION 
. 
Ixyii 
In all his available three works, Suryadeva styles himself as a triskandhárthavid, 'knower of the three branches of Jyotişa', viz., Ganita (Siddhanta), Horā and Samhita. The statement is exemplified by his commentaries on the Aryabhatīya, Laghumānasa and Mahābhās kariya-vyākhyā on Ganita (Siddhānta), Jātakapaddhati on Horā and Mahāyātra on Samhita. 
The personal deity whom Suryadeva worshipped appears to he Lord Krsna whom he invokes as 'the effulgence that is at the base of the creation, sustenance and destruction of the universe', at the beginning of his commentary on the Jatakapaddhati, in the verse : 
अगदुदयस्थितिसंहतिकारणमविकारि सचिवानन्दम् । 
श्रीमत् तत् कृष्णाख्यं तेजो मे हृदि सदा स्फुरतु ।। He pays obeisance to Lord Kļşņa in his form as the charioteer of Arjuna on the battle-field, wielding the whip and preaching the spiritual doctrine of the Gitā, at the beginning of his Laghumānasa vyakhyā also. Cf. : 
अध्यात्मविद्यामुपदेशयन्तं दृढं प्रपन्नाय धनञ्जयाय । 
प्रतोदहस्तं प्रगृहीतरश्मि देवं प्रपद्ये वसुदेवसूनुम् ॥ 
He mentions Lord Krşpa, son of Devakī, also towards the close of his commentary on the Jätakapaddhatt of Śrīpati (c. A. D. 1039), where he hopes that, by the grace of that God, he would be able to comment also on the Khandakhadyaka (of Brabmagupta). Cf. idānīm Bhatta-Brahmaguptaksta-Khandakhadyakavyācikīrşā vartate / tam ca Krsko Devakīputraḥ parayişyari // 
2. Date of Suryadeva 
Definitive evidence is supplied by Suryadeva himself about his date. In the colophons to his Laghumānasa-vyakhyā, chs. II and III, he clearly states that he was born in the saka year 1113 (=A. D. 1191) : 
'विश्वेश'-शाक-कुम्भार्कहस्तजूकर्तजन्मना । सूर्यदेवेन कपिता विप्रश्नाध्यायवासना ॥ 
and 
'faga g'-*77*-*WTFFFAH दशिता सूर्यदेवेन प्रहणाध्यायवासना ॥ 
xxviii 
, ARYABHATIYA 
___Elsewhere in the same work (com. on I. 3-4) he states that he was born on Monday, third tithi of the dark half of the month of 
Magha in Saka 1113, the Kali date for the day being 15,68,004.1 
. 
. 
. 
. 
___Further down, in another context in the same work, (com. cn. ch. I. 5), he gives also the mean position of the Sun at the time of his birth, as computed by him : .. .जातो राश्यादिको रविमध्यमः १०-८-३०. ....."एवं मज्जन्मदिने सोमवारमध्याहने अर्कमध्यमो गणितः । अस्या रात्री घटिका द्वादशगते जन्मकालत्वात् सप्तविंशतिघटिकासम्बन्धिनी रविभक्तिरर्धाधिक्येन सप्त विशतिकलात्मिका अस्मिन् मध्यमे योज्या। तथा कृत्वा जातोऽस्मत्कालिको रविमध्यमः 
१०-८-५७ । 
3. Suryadeva's provenance 
References made by Suryadeva in his Laghumānasa-vyakhyā go to show that he was a native of the Cola country in South India and -Wrote at Gangāpura or Gangăpurī, which may be identified with Gangai-konda-Colapuram (lat 11° 13' N, long. 79° 30' E), on the basis of astronomical observations made at this place recorded by Suryadeva himself. Thus, under Laghumānasa, II. 1, he states that the equinoctial midday shadow at Gangāpura is 27 angulas which corresponds to the latitude of 11°.3. So also the ascensional differences and times of risings of the signs also correspond to this place, 3 Sūryadeva also 
1. Cf. : 'विश्वेश'-मिते शाके (1113=A. D. 1191) माघकृष्णतृतीयायां सोमवारे प्राचार्यार्यभटसिद्धान्तसिद्धोऽस्मज्जन्मदिनेऽहर्गण: १५,६८,००४ । अस्य वाक्यम् 'विज्ञानदीप्ताशयः। 
2. Cf. : विषुवद्दिनमध्याह्नच्छाया विषुवच्छायेति च प्रतिदेशं भेदेन स्मर्यते । यथा चोलदेशे गङ्गापुरे [विषुवच्छाया] अङ्गुलद्वयम् अगुलषष्टिभागाश्चतुर्विंशति: 'वीर 
श्रीः' इति । (Com. on LMa., II. 1) 
3. Cf.: चोलदेशे गङ्गापुरे सिद्धाश्चरगुणाः क्रमेण ४८, ३८, १६ (Com. on LMa., II. 1). 
गङ्गापुरे चरगुणानामर्धानि क्रमेण २४, १६, ८ एतः क्रमेण हीना वसुभादयः मेषस्य २५४, वृषस्य २८०, मिथुनस्य ३१५. एवमेतानि गङ्गापुरे मेषादिद्वादशराश्युदय विनाडीमानानि भवन्ति । (Com. on LMa., II. 2). 
६ 
INTRODUCTION 
• 
Στίχ 
states that Gangapurī is 11 yojanas from Kharanagara and is to the east of the Hindu prime meridian. 
5. WORKS OF SURYADEVA 
1. Known works 
Suryadeva was primarily a commentator both on astronomy and astrology. No original work of his has been unearthed. His known works are : 
1. Com. on the Aryabhatīyā of Aryabhata (b. A. D. 476) 2. Com. on the Laghumanasa of Muñjala (A. D. 932) 
imit 
4. Com. on the Mahabhāskariya-vyākhyā of Govindasvămi. 5. Com. on the Yoga-yātrā of Varāhamihira (A. D. 505) 6. Com. on the Khandakhādyaka of Brahmagupta (A. D. 628) 
of the six works mentioned above, manuscripts of the first three are available but the last three are known only from references to 
them by the author himself. 
2. Chronology of the works 
: The ascertainment of the chronology of Sūryadeva's works does not pose a problem, for he himself gives the order of his works. Thus, towards the close of his commentary on Laghumānasa, he says: 
1. Cf.: staat tygaf: ETATTET 7 grat ThartsEqt Sport रेखाया: पूर्वदेशे स्थितत्वात् गङ्गापुयाँ चन्द्रे क्षयं कृत्वा शेषो देशान्तरसंस्कृतश्चन्द्रमध्यमो Hafari (Com. on LMa, I. iii. 3). 
It may be noted here that hitherto it had been held that Surya deva hailed from Kerala, but without any substantial proof, Vide Ulloor, Kerala Sahitya Charitram, (Trivandrum, Vol. II, 1954), p. 97; Vata kkumkur Rajaraja Varma, Keralīya Samskrita Sahitya Charitram, (Vol. I, Trivandrum, M. E. 1113), pp. 390-92; K. K. Raja, 'Astronomy and mathematics in Kerala', (Adyar Library Bulletin, 27 (1963), 131-32); and the present writer, A history of the Kerala school of Hindu astronomy, (Hoshiarpur, 1972), p. 48. 
xxx 
ARYABHATIYA 
पूर्व मया कृता ग्रन्था अनुक्रम्यन्ते। भास्कराचार्य-महातन्त्र विवरणं गोविन्द स्वाम्यं प्रथमं व्याख्यातम् । तत आर्यभटीयशास्त्रस्य भटप्रकाशाख्यं संक्षिप्तभाष्यं कृतम् । ततो वराहमिहिरकृता महायात्रा संक्षेपतो व्याख्याता । अथेदं मानसाख्यं करणं मूलवासनासहित-संक्षेपवासनाप्रदर्शनार्थ विस्तरेण विवृतम् । इदानीं श्रीपतिकृता जातकपद्धतिश्च व्याख्यासिता। तावद् वाग्देवी सरस्वती पूरयिष्यतीति सिद्धम् । 
While, in the above passage, Suryadeva gives the order of his works as commentaries on the Mahābhaskarīya-vyākhyā, (Vivarāņa), of Govindasvami, Aryabhatiya of Aryabhata, Yogayatra of Varahamihira, Laghumānasa of Muñjāla and adds that he intended to comment on the Jatakapaddhati of Śrīpati; the last-mentioned commentary has at its end the statement that he then intended to comment on the Khandakhādyaka of Brahmagupta. Cf: 
इदानीं भट्ट-ब्रह्मगुप्त-कृत-खण्ड खाद्यक-व्याचिकीर्षा विद्यते । तां च कृष्णो देवकीपुत्रः पूरयिष्यति। 
6. ARYABHAȚIYA-VYAKHYA 
1. Nature of the work 
Suryadeva calls his commentary on the Aryabhatiya by the name Prakaśa,' while later writers apply to it also the appellation Prakāśikā, often prefixed with such expressions as Bhața-, Aryabhața- and Arya bhatiya-. 
To Sūryadeva every verse of Aryabhata is a sūtra. Towards the beginning of his commentary, Suryadeva states that he was attempting to give a 'succinct' (sanksipya) exposition of the sutras of Aryabhata (Intro, verse 3, p. 1). But the commentary is much more than succinct. Though not elaborate, it is full and adequate enough to provide a good understanding of the text. He prefixes the commentary with a special Introduction (upodghāta) which sets out the nature, contents and significance of the discipline of Jyotișa in its 
1. Cf. : इति प्रकाशो गदित: सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना । 
(Col. to Gītika-pāda, p. 32) 2. See for instance, Paramesvara in his Aryabhatiya-vyākhyā on 
___i. 7: भट-प्रकाशिकायां उच्चपातानां गतिरन्यथा प्रदर्शिता। 
INTRODUCTION 
different branches? (pp. 1-7). The Gola-pada which deals with the celestial sphere and spherical astronomy is also prefixed with a special introductory section (pp. 118-22). Suryadeva's explanations are generally elucidative and his statements are sometimes backed by the citations of earlier authorities. The mathematics set out in the Ganita-pada is generally illustrated by worked out examples and the computations of planets set out in the Gola-pāda with directions for practical demonstrations. 
2. Notable points 
1. Date of Aryabhața 
While divergent views have been held as to whether the Kali year 3600 mentioned in Abh, iii. 10 refers to the date of Aryabhata's birth or to the date of the composition of Aryabhatīya, Suryadeva categorically agrees with the latter view. 
Thus he gives the meaning of ĀBh, iii. 10 as follows : "When 3600 solar years have elapsed in Kali, which is the fourth part of the sorrent (mahā-)yuga, this treatise (Aryabhațīya) has been composed by me who am 23 years old.” (p. 93). 
Explaining the purpose of the mention of the date of the work as above by Aryabhata, Suryadeva adds : "What is the purpose of this statement ? I shall explain. At this point of time, the mean positions of the planets, and their apogees and nodes, as computed using their revolution-numbers given in the Gitika-pāda, would be exact (and, so, do not stand in need of any correction). At that point of time, the Sun's northward and southward transits, respectively, occurred exactly at the commencement of Capricorn and Cancer, (the precession of the equinoxes being zero)." (com. on iii, 10, p. 93). Corrections in com putations could, therefore, be counted from this date. 
2. Daśagitika and Āryāşțaśata–Two works 
While the Gītikā-pāda, on the one hand, and the Gaạita, Kālakriya and Gola-pādas, on the other, together make up the Aryabhațiya, Suryadeva points out that essentially, the two are independent works. Posing a question, “Then, how is this discipline constituted of two 
1. For the details of these views, see Pt. I, pp. 95-98. 
dixii 
, ÅRYABHATIYA 
works ?" he explains : "In the Daśagītikā is to be found, at the beginning, (i.e., in Gitikā, 1), the (formal) invocation, mention of authorship and the subject to be treated. And, at the close, (vs. 13), is found the concluding statement of the benefits of the study (of the work). Hence this is a complete treatise. (Similarly), at the beginning of the other tract (Ganita, 1) also, are to be found an invocation, mention of authorship and the subject to be treated. And, at the end (Gola, 50) (is found), a (formal) conclusion indicating also the title of the treatise. Hence, it is a different work. Thus, the discipline definitely consists of two works.” (com. on Gitikā, 12, p. 31 ; see also p. 5). 
It may be noted that the same view has been expressed by the commentators Bhāskara, Someśvara and Raghunatha-răja. 
3. Identification of the Ten Gitikās 
Of the thirteen verses contained in the Gitikāpāda, there is difference of opinion among commentators about the identification of the 'ten' (daśa) gitikas which constitute the teachings of Brahma. It is accepted on all hands that verses 1 and 13 are, respectively, the invo catory and concluding verses and so are not included in the 'ten'. While commentator Paramęśvara holds vss. 3-12 as the 'ten' gitikās, taking vs. 2 as a mere paribhaşā (“interpretative definition'), Suryadeva considers vss. 2-11 as the 'ten' gitikās, excluding vs. 12, which enumerates the R-sines which are, of course, otherwise derivable. More over, according to him, verse 12 is couched in the ärya metre, and not in the giti metre. Thus, speaking about the enunciation of the discipline, which Aryabhata imbibed from Brahma, he says : “Then that teacher Aryabhata enunciated all instructions of a seminal nature in 'ten' giti stanzas and that of a secondary nature relating to general mathematics as envisaged by his own mind in a single āryā verse and propounded them before the world.” (Cf. General introduction to the com., p. 5). He expresses the same view also in his commentary to i, 12 (p. 31). 
It may be noted that in the form in which vs. 12 is given by Suryadeva, it is not in the giti metre, but in the aryā metre, though not a perfect āryā. 
1. 
For a discussion on this topic, see Pt. I, pp. 31-32, 
INTRODUCTION 
triji 
4. Traditional verses , 
Soryadeva's commentary preserves certain anonymous traditional verses on astronomical matters. Among these may be mentioned the revolution numbers of the apogees and ascending nodes of the planets over long periods (on Gitikā, 9, pp. 26-27) and the tija correction for the mean longitudes of the planets with epoch at Kali 3600 (on Kala, 11, p. 94). 
5. Use of the Katapayādi notation 
It is noteworthy that for expressing numbers, besides the bhuta sankhyā notation, Suryadeva makes use also of the Katapayādi notation. (See, e.g., com. on ii. 11, 12 : pp. 48-51), which is a peculiarity of South India, corroborating his South Indian provenance. It might be added here that the Kațapayādi notation is used by Suryadeva profusely in his commentary on the Laghumānasa, 
6. Automatic Gola-yantra 
Suryadeva describes a Gola-yantra wbich rotates automatically keeping pace with time. About its construction he says: "Fix two posts on the ground in the north-south direction and fix on them the two ends of an iron rod (which passes through the centre of an armillary sphere). Apply oil to the holes at the north and scuth poles of the sphere (through which the iron rod passes) so that the sphere might rotate smoothly. Then, on the ground below the west point of the sphere dig a pit and fix in it a (narrow) cylinder with a (closed) hole at its lower end and as high as the circumference of the sphere. Fill the cylinder with water. Then fix a nail at the west point of the sphere and fasten to it one end of a string. Pass the string downwards along the equator towards the east point. Then stretch it upwards and take it to the west point (again). Then attach to the string a dry hollow gourd filled with mercury and place it on the surface of the water in the cylinder kept filled with water. Now, open the hole at the bottom of the cylinder. As the water flows out, its level falls. Consequently, the gourd, weighed down as it is by mercury, (also goes down) not leaving (the surface of) the water, and (the string attached to it) pulls the sphere west wards. The outflow of water should be regulated in such a manner that in 30 ghatikäs (=12 hours), half the water in the cylinder flows out and 
A.B.S. y 
iitiv 
ÁRYABHATIYA 
the shpere rotates one half. Similarly, in the next 30 ghaţikās the entire water flows out, the gourd reaches the bottom of the cylinder and the sphere completes one full rotation. In this manner, the sphere could be rotated intelligently keeping pace with time.” (Gola, 22, pp. 143-44). 
7. Verification of a Computational System 
Explaining the method of the verification of astronomical computation by observation Süryadeva states : 
“In an open spot construct a perfectly circular platform of desired radius in angulas, raised to the height of the eye, with the east-west and north-south lines drawn (through the centre) and 21,600 equal divisions (of minutes) marked on its circumference. Then, at sunrise and sunset, stand (in turn) at the west and east sides of the platform and observe the half-risen and half-set Sun, respectively, and mark their positions on the circumference as indicated by the gnomon (fixed at the centre of the circle). Mark also the opposite points on the circumference as indicated by the shadow of the gnomon. Mark also a point at the tip of the mid-day shadow. When the Sun is in the northern hemisphere, place another gnomon on the east-west line and observe daily the entrance of the shadow on that line. These observations should be continued for two or three years. If the sun, observed thus, is seen exactly in the positions arrived at by computation, then that computation is to be understood as correct. If the time of the entrance of the midday shadow on the north-south line corresponds to that derived by computation, then also the correctness of the computation is verified. In the same way, the correctness of the computation may be verified also by the observation of the north-south midday shadow, when it is either maximum or totally absent. The verification of the computed Sun with the observed Sun is done in this manner. 
“The Moon will also be correct if the computed conjunction of the Moon with the observed Sun is found to be identical with the observed one at the time of eclipses. And, the other planets too will be correct if the computed conjunctions of the Moon (as verified) above with the computed planets are in conformity with the observed one, to be correct.” (Com. on Gola, 48, pp. 182-83). 8. A discrepancy in Lalla explained 
After specifying that at Kali 3600 (Šaka 421), when the Arya 
INTRODUCTION 
Whatīva was composed, and at which time the mean positions of the planets computed from the parameters given on the Daśagitikā-sätras did not require any correction, Suryadeva indicates the annual bija corrections to be applied to subsequent years, as stated by Lalla, whom he mentions as a pupil of Aryabhata. But these corrections are stated by Lalla, to start from Saka 420 and not 421. Drawing attention to this discrepancy, Suryadeva explains that the corrections are to be applied actually from 421, and that the mention of 420 was merely for ease in statement (ukti-saukaryat). (Com. on Kala, 10, p. 94). 
9. Justification of the number of Rsines as 24 
Posing a question, "Why should there be the rule that the number of Rsines (in a quadrant) is restricted to 24, when the quadrant of a circle can be divided into any number of segments", Sūryadeva answers that it is so, since, on dividing the quadrant into 24 equal parts, the first Rsine and the corresponding arc are exactly the same. So this is the appropriate division, because the Acărya has stated the Rsine difference in terms of minutes. When they are to be stated in terms of seconds, one should divide the quadrant suitably. (Com. on Ganita, 11, p. 50). 
AM 
10. Division of the Yuga 
Aryabhata seems to have indicated the division of the Yuga (Kāla, 9) into Utsarpiņi, Apasarpiņi, Suşama and Duşşama, more as a statement of general currency, than with any astronomical purpose. Different authorities hold different views in the matter. Commen taries also differ in the interpretation of the verse. (Vide Pt. I, pp. 93-95). 
Suryadeva merely paraphrases the verse as : "The first half of the yuga, when the longevity, fame and strength of creatures are waxing, is called Utsarpini. The latter half of the yuga, when these are in the wane, is called Apasarpini. Again, the first and last thirds of the yuga are termed Duşşama and the middle third Suşamā.” He then adds : "The significance of this (division) can be explained (only) by the learned after deep deliberation." And, according to one of the manuscripts, the commentary adds: “To me, it is not known." (p. 92). 
XXXVI 
ARYABHATIYA 
11. Position of Ujjayini 
Suryadeva endeavours to assign an astroncmically significant latitude to Ujjain, viz., 24° N on the meridian of Lankā, which latter is taken, in Indian astronomy, to be a city located at the equator at 0° meridian. Thus, while explaining the passage 
उज्जयिनी लङ्काया: तच्चतुरंशे समोतरतः । 
(Ā, Gola, 14) Suryadeva notes that the angular distance from Lankā to Meru at the north pole is 90° and that the angular distance of Ujjayinī from Lanka would be 22. according to the above reading of the passage, with the expression taccaturamse. Now, 221° has no astronomical significance, He argues that Aryabhata should have mentioned Ujjayinī only to indicate a place of maximum declination of the Sun, viz., 24°; otherwise, there was no purpose in mentioning Ujjayinī at all. Hence, he argues, the correct reading of the expression should be pañcadasaṁse; the intended measure of the latitude, viz., 24°, would then be duly indicated, it being one-fifteenth of a complete circle of 360°. 
12. Motion of the Stars and the Planets contrasted 
Suryadeva specifies that the stars appear as if fixed on the zodiac and the zodiac, along with the stars, moves as a whole from east to west. The planets, however, are seen to move from one asterism to another to the east. This indicates the eastward motion of the planets. (Com, on Gitikā, 3, p. 14). 
13. The nodes and apogees 
It is well known that the node and apogee of a planet are not material objects like the planet itself, the former being just the point where the planet, in its northward course, crosses the ecliptic and the latter the remotest point of the planet's orbit from the earth. However, these points keep on changing their positions, the said motion being capable of being counted in terms of revolutions during long periods of time. The point is well brought out by Suryadeva. 
Thus, after enumerating the number of revolutions of the nodes and apogees per yuga as depicted jo Ā, j. 4, Suryadeva poses the 
INTRODUCTION 
IIxvii 
question : "Now, only seven planets are to be seen revolving in the sky. And, their revolutions have already been enumerated. What are these (new bodies), the nodes and apogees, whose revolutions are being enumerated here ?" Then he provides the reply: "(The answer) is stated thus : These (nodes and apogees) are (not material objects but) just some special numerical figures which have been conceived by astronomers) as a means to compute the true motion etc, of the self same planets (mentioned earlier). These do not have any visual appearance in the sky.” (p. 17).' 
14. Use of 'siva', a unique measure denomination 
Under Ganita 26, Suryadeva sets the following example : 
"A certain commodity measuring) one and one-eighth of a siva is bought for 124 paņas ; how much of the same (commodity) could be bought for 6 panas ?” 
The solution given by him shows that the siva mentioned in the above example is a measure of weight, equivalent to 8 prasthas. In Indian mathematical parlance the word śiva is used to denote the number 11, in conformity with the number of the rudra-s (siva), being eleven, but we have so far not come across this term used to indicate a measure of weight. But use of this measure by Sūryadeva shows that this measure was in use in the locality where Süryadeva lived. 
15. Lord of the civil year 
Aryabhata gives a method to find the lords of the hour and the day (Kāla., 16), but he does not say how the lord of the civil year or the civil month is to be found. Suryadeva, however, gives the follow ing method in this regard : 
"Subtract 13,17,416 from the civil days elapsed since the beginning of Kaliyuga. The remainder divided by 360 gives the civil years 
1. Cf. : agacha ukt aufta rat gaura i aqi a Hitor gagata दिष्टाः । क एते उच्चपाता येषामत्र भगणोपदेशः क्रियते ? उच्यते-तेषामेव ग्रहाणां स्फुटगत्यादिपरिज्ञानोपायभूता: केचन संख्याविशेषाः। नैषां व्योम्नि दर्शनमस्ति । (Com. on i. 4, p. 17). 
Xxxviii 
ARYABHATIYA 
elapsed, as the quotient. The remainder of the division), when divided by 30, yields the civil months elapsed, as the quotient. The 
remainder gives the civil days elapsed of the current civil month. The lord of the first day of the year is called 'the lord of the year and the lord of the first day of the month is called 'the lord of the month'... Here, the number of civil years elapsed when multiplied by 3, then incre ased by 1, and then divided by 7, the remainder counted from Sunday gives the lord of the current year. The number of civil months elapsed when multiplied by 2, increased by 1, and then divided by 7, the remaining days counted from the lord of the current year give the lord of the current month." 
The number 13,17,416 which Suryadeva subtracts in the above rule is of special significance. This closely agrees with the teaching of Varahamihira in his Pañca-şiddhāntika, i. 17. According to Varāha mihira, a civil year started 13,14,896 days after the commencement of Kaliyuga. The difference of the two epochs is 2520 days, i.e., exactly 7 civil years. Thus, according to Varahamihira, a civil year started 35 days before Aryabhata was 23 years old ; and according to Surya deva, a civil year started exactly 7 civil years thereafter. 
We do not know to which school the above teaching actually belongs. It certainly does not conform to the teaching of Aryabhata nor to the teaching of Brahmagupta ; (see Pệthūdaka's commentary on the Khandakhādhyaka, i. 32, and Bhattotala's commentary on the same work, i. 25). 
There are certain astronomers who take the lord of the first day of the bright half of Caitra as the lord of the year. But this view is against the teaching of the Brahma school. Pșthadaka says: "Those who take the lord of the first day of the light half of Caitra as the lord of the year, do not understand the Brahma-siddhanta. They have explained the Brahma-siddhānta incorrectly ; for the lord of the year occurs after every 360 days commencing from the beginning of the Kalpa.” 
16. Solstitial motion in the School of Saryadeva 
Suryadeva states a correction due to solstitial motion and ascribes it to tradition. He says : 
ÎNTRODUCTION 
*xxix 
"Subtract 3600 from the Kali year and divide by 5,808. (Neglect the quotient and divide the remainder by 1452. Treating the remainder as bhuja, multiply it by 2 and divide by 121; the result in degrees etc. is to be applied like the bhujā-phala to the longitudes of the planets and the solstitial points. By so doing, they agree with observation.” (See below, p. 94). 
The motion of the solstices is evidentiy the precession of the equinoxes. The value thereof, according to the above passage, is 59".5 per annum, where the modern value is 50" approximately. 
17. General remarks 
Generally, Süryadeva's comments are fuller on the astronomical sections of the Aryabhaļīyā than on the mathematical sections, with a few exceptions, such as the derivation of the Rsines (ii. 11-12, pp. 47-51) and the Pulveriser (ii. 31-32, pp. 70-79). On the astronomical sections, apart from the detailed exposition of the celestial sphere, (Gola-bandha, pp. 118-22) and the explanation of the motion of the planets through epicycles (Graha-bhramaņa-väsanā, pp. 110-16), his exposition of the Drimandala and DỊkkṣepamaņdala (pp. 142-43), Akşajya and Lambaka (pp. 144-46), Lańkodayaprāņa (pp. 147-50), Kșitijyā and Caraprāņa (pp. 150-52), Svadeśarašyudaya (pp. 152-54), Iştakālasanku (pp. 154-56), Drkkşepajyā (pp. 160-64) and Drggatijyā (pp. 164-66) are full and detailed. It is also noteworthy that, in several cases, he speaks of the demonstration of the different items on the armillary sphere : Cf. com. on iv. 36 (p. 168), 40 (p. 172), 41 (p. 175) etc. 
7. Laghumānasa-vyākhyā! 
1. The Work 
Suryadeva's commentary on the Laghumanasa of Muñjāla is certainly his magnum opus. This work, which he calls by the name Grahajñānavāsanā, is extensive, discursive and highly informative. For the 60 verses of the text, the commentary extends sixty-fold thereof. The work begins with the verses : 
1. The details furnished here are based on an edition of the work under preparation by the present writer from mss, available with him and the Mss. Libraries in Madras and Trivandrum. 
ARYABHATİYA 
अध्यात्मविद्यामुपदेशयन्तं वढं प्रपन्नाय धनञ्जयाय । प्रतोदहस्तं प्रगृहीतरश्मिं देवं प्रपद्ये वसुदेवसू नुम् ।। स्कन्धत्रयार्थविदुषा सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना । 
मानसाख्यग्रहज्ञानवासनाऽऽद्य प्रकाश्यते ॥ The work ends with the verse : 
इत्थं मानसकरणं व्याख्यातं सूर्यदेवसोमसुता। 
श्री-सूर्यदेवनाम्नो मातृभ्रातुः प्रसादेन ॥ followed the colophon : 
इति श्री-सूर्यदेवसोमसुत्-विरचिते मानसव्याख्याने ग्रहोदयास्तमयाधिकारश्चतुर्थः । सम्पूर्णमिदं मानसव्याख्यानम् । 
2. Its date 
The date of composition of this commentary should be about A.D. 1248, as could be presumed from the author indicating this date as the starting point for the computation of the planets and giving as zero-corrections the planetary positions at this date. Thus he says : अन ध्रुवकनिबन्धनप्रकारदर्शनाय मानसाख्यकरणप्रतिपादितगणादिमध्यमानयनगणितधुगणादे: कालदर्घ्यकृतवैषम्यप्रदर्शनाय च 'खागेश मिते शककाले (Saka 1170=A.D. 1248) अस्माभिधुवका: प्रदर्श्यन्ते । (Upodghata-prakarana to the com., vs. 5). Further down, in the same section, Süryadeva lays down the same in six verses : अथ अस्मदीय-ध्रुवकनिबन्धनार्यासूत्राणि प्रदर्श्यन्ते 
'खागेश' मिते शाके चैत्रादौ जीवदिनदले भादिः । etc. 
Since he wrote the commentary towards A.D. 1248, Suryadeva (b. 1191) should have composed it when he was 57 years old. 
3. Aim of the commentary 
Towards the beginning of the Introductory Section (Upodghāta prakaraņa) prefixed to his commentary, Süryadeva refers to an earlier commentary by Prasastidhara (c. A.D. 10th cent.), a Kashmirian astronomer on the Laghumanasa' and adds that though Praśastidhara 
___ 1. A ms. of this com. is available in the Sarasvati Bhandar of the Sanskrit College, Mysore, being Ms. No. 739, in Grantha script, and another in the Calcutta University Library, 
INTRODUCTION 
has included examples in the commentary, the commentary lacked expository demonstrations of the text (mala-vasana) as also the rationales of the rules stated there. Hence he was coming forward to write an elaborate commentary on the work presenting demonstrations of both types and also giving worked out examples. An examination of Suryadeva's commentary would show that it eminently fulfils the objective set out by its author. 
8. Jatakapaddhati-vyākhyā (Jātakālaňkāra) 
The Jātaka-paddhati, called also Jātaka-karma-paddhati, in eight chapters, by Śrīpati (A.D. 1039), son of Nagadeva and grandson of Keśava of the Kāśyapa gotra, is a popular work of all-India prevalence on predictive astrology based on horoscopes. Of the nearly 20 known commentaries on the work, the Jātakalankāra of Suryadeva is the most popular, especially in South India. 
The work commences with an invocation on Süryadeva's favourite deity Lord Krşņa : 
जगदुदयस्थितिसंहृतिकारणमविकारि सच्चिदानन्दम् । श्रीमत् तत् कृष्णाख्यं तेजो मे हृदि सदा स्फुरतु ॥ आचार्यश्रीपतिकृता जातके कर्मपद्धतिः । व्याख्यायते मया स्पष्टं सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना ॥ 
1. Cf. : afer flyttarfear wafegetatio IETT UTETTI तत्र मूलवासना संक्षेपवासना वा न प्रदर्शिता । उभयविधवासनाप्रदर्शनार्थ प्रस्माभि रुदाहरणप्रदर्शनपुरस्सरं विस्तरेण व्याख्यायते । 
It may be noted that Praśastidhara's commentary is cited by Suryadeva also under ch. I. ii. 5-6a ; IV. 6, 8 and 10, either in corraboration or in refutation. 
2. For reference to mss. of these commentaries, see New catalogus catalogorum, vol. VII, Madras, 1973, pp. 211-13. 
3. For mss., see ibid., p. 213. 
4. The observations on this work are based on a manuscript of the work preserved in the Kerala Uni. Or. Res. Inst. and Mss. Library, Trivandrum, No. T. 953. A.Bh S, vi 
H11 [ IT 
ÅR YABHAȚIYA पश्यन्तु तमिमं प्रन्थं शास्त्रन्यायोपबृंहितम् । 
पूर्णजातकशास्त्राणामलङ्कारं विपश्चितः ॥ इह खलु विशिष्ट: सिद्धाचार: सिद्धः । प्रारभ्यमाणस्य प्रन्थस्याविघ्नपरिसमाप्ति सकल देशपुरुषव्यक्तिप्रयोजनम् , अभीष्टदेवतास्तुतिनमस्कारादिरूपं मङ्गलाचरणं कृत्वा प्रन्थारम्भं प्रतिजानीते । तदयमपि श्रीपतिराचार्योऽभीष्टदेवतानमस्कारपूर्व जातककर्म पद्धत्याख्यं प्रन्यकरणं श्लोकेन प्रतिजानीते-नत्वा तं गुरुदेवतां etc. 
The work ends with the following : 
सर्व सम्पूर्णमेव । अस्माभिः कृतस्यास्य व्याख्यानस्य प्रन्थसंख्या पञ्चाशदधिकचतुः शतयुतसहस्रद्वयपरिमिता भवति । 
इत्थं निध्रुवगोत्रेण सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना । 
कृतं जातकपद्धत्यां सङ्कीर्णफलवर्णनम् ॥ Col. : इति सूर्यदेवसोमसुत्-विरचिते श्रीपतिव्याख्याने जातकालङ्कारे प्रकीर्णाध्यायः । 
Suryadeva's commentary is not very elaborate but, as stated by him in the third introductory verse above, it is fāstranyāyopabộmhitam and is rich in secondary information in the form of quotations from a number of astrological authorities. From among the less known astrological authorities may be mentioned Badarayana, Devakirti, Krsnaditya, Maya and Śrīdhara. Süryadeva quotes also anonymous traditional verses and refers them to rși-s or sampradāyavid-s. 
9. Commentary on the Mahābhāskariya.vivarana 
The first work that Süryadeva wrote was a commentary on the Mahābhāskarīya-vyākhyā of Govinda-svāmi. He mentions this fact, as indicated earlier, towards the close of his commentary on the Laghumānasa, in the words : "The works written by me earlier are enumerated (here): First was commented the commentary Vivarana by Govinda-svāmi on Bhaskarācārya's Mahatantra (Mahabhaskariya)." Manuscripts of this commentary, however, are yet to be unearthed and therefore, the nature or extent of this commentary cannot be as certained. Suryadeva should have given vent to his youthful ardour 
1. For the edition of Govinda-svami's Vyākhyā, see T.S. Kuppanna Sastri, Mahābhāskarīya with the Bhaşya of Govinda-svāmin and the super-commentary Siddhāntadipikā of Parameśvara, Govt. Or. Mss. Library, Madras, 1957. 
INTRODUCTION 
xliii 
over the erudite and extensive Vivaraņa of Govinda-svāmī and if his later commentaries are any cue, this commentary, too, should have been extensive and highly informative. 
10. Mahāyātrā-Vyakhyā 
Another work of Suryadeva about which he makes a mention towards the end of his commentary on the Laghumānasa, is a commentary on the Mahayatrā of Varahamihira: tato Varahamihira krta Mahāyātrā sankşepato vyākhyātä. Manuscripts of this work, too, are yet to be traced. Highly informed as Suryadeva was in ancient literature on natural astrology, his commentary on the Mahāyātrā should have contained substantial information and citations to earlier literature on the subject. 
11. Khandakhadyaka-vyākhyā 
Suryadeva states towards the end of his commentary on the Jatakapaddhati of Śrīpati that he intended to write a commentary on the Khandakhadyaka of Brahmagupta : Cf. idanim Bhatta-Brahmagupta kļta-Khandakhadyaka-vyācikirşá vartate / tam ca Kļşņo Devakīputraḥ pūrayisyati. Possibly, this commentary has been written, but manu scripts thereof yet remain to be traced. 
12. SURYADEVA'S METHOD OF EXPOSITION 
1. Presentation of the background 
It is noteworthy that Suryadeva always sets out the background or the intent of a verse before he gives its exposition. In the case of important sections of the works, he prefixes his commentary with full-fledged 'Introductions' (upodghấta-s) setting out the preliminary matter for a proper understanding of the respective sections. Such Introductions occur to the Gola-pāda of the Aryabhatiya and sections relating to the Dhruya-sutras, Sphuta and Tripraśna of the Laghumanasa. 
1. Mahayātrā is called also Brhadyatrā and Yaksāśvamedhīya. The work has been edited by H. Kern, with German translation in Indische Studien, 10 (1868), 14 (1876), and in his Verspriede Geschriften, vol. I 's-Gravenhage. 1913: by Jagadish Lal, Lahore, 1944; and by Dard Pingree, Govt. Or. Mss. Library, Madras, 1972, 
zliy 
: 
' ARYABHATIYA 
A mention might be made here of the 'General Introductions' to his commentary on the Aryabhatiya (pp. 1-7) and the elaborate Upodghāta prakarana to his Laghumānasa-vyakhyā, indicating the place of Jyotisa as an auxiliary of the Veda (Vedānga), the objectives of the discipline, its main division into Gaạita, Horă and Samhita, the secondary divisions thereof, and the purpose served by each division. Towards the end, he also states his objective in attempting to compose the commentary. 
2. Critical approach 
Suryadeva's commentaries are characterised by a critical approach. This is best exemplified by his commentary on the Laghumānasa. Often he distinguishes correct readings from corrupt ones and, at places, argues about the authenticity of a reading. An instance in point is his commentary on A, Gola., 14 (c-d) : 
उज्जयिनी लङ्कायाः तच्चतुरंशे समोत्तरतः । 
After explaining the text according to the above reading, Suryadeva notices that the expression taccaturamie, i.e., one fourth of 90° (=223°) does not have any astronomical significance and, so, asserts that the correct reading should be pancadalamse, i.e., one fifteenth of 360° (=24°) which indicates the place where the Sun has the maximum declination. 
A similar instance which occurs in the commentary on the Laghumanasa, IV, 5, may also be cited here : 
चरतानांशषड्वर्गविशेषेणाक्षमाहतात् । स्वविक्षेपादवाप्तेन स्वचरं संस्कृतं स्फुटम् ।। 
After commenting on the verse according to the above reading, Surya deva observes : अत्र सूत्रकृता त्रिंशतो भादि'श्चरतानांश' इति स्थूलदृष्टया उक्तम्, यस्माद् भागहारस्य षड्वर्गस्योक्तन्यायेन त्रिज्यातः ताव्यासार्धकृता सर्वदेशेषु क्रियता 
1. C. : एवं अर्कस्योत्तरपरमापक्रमावच्छिन्नप्रदेशज्ञानार्थ उज्जयिन्युपदेश इति संगच्छते । षोडशभागस्थाया उज्जयिन्या उपदेशे न किञ्चित् प्रयोजनं पश्यामः, तस्य सार्घ विशतिभागात्मकत्वात् तस्य क्वचिदपि प्रयोजनाभावात् । अत: सुष्ठूक्तम् 
उज्जयिनी लक्षायाः पञ्चदशांशे समोत्तरतः । इति । (p. 136) 
r 
INTRODUCTION जानिः । सत्रोक्तप्रकारेण प्रत्यन्तरदेशं विषुवच्छाया रूपं वर्तते । अथ विषुवच्छायाङ्गुले रूपमिते परमहानिरर्धाधिक्येन रूपतुल्या अष्टौ। अष्टाङ्गुलमिते परमहानिः सप्ततुल्या। अतो हानिमात्रं क्वाचिकमभिप्रेत्य आचार्येणोक्तम्-'चरतानांशषड्वर्ग' इति । यतो यथोक्त मेव गणितकर्मवासना । एतदनुसारि समीचीनोऽयं पाठ:-- 
प्रतिदो निमेते (?)के होनषड्वर्गभाजिता ।। 
पलध्ना ---भाप्तेन स्वचरं संस्कृतं स्फुटम् ॥ इति । Suryadeva senses an objection even to this reading, but explains it away : नन्वस्मिन्नपि पक्षे स्फुटक्रान्त्यानीतस्वाहोरात्रार्धन कर्म कर्तव्यम् । सत्यम् । तज्ज्ञानस्य लघुगणितेनाशक्यत्वात् स्वल्पान्तरत्वाच्च एवमुक्तमित्यविरोधः । 
Still another instance of Sūryadeva’s rationalistic approach might be seen in his statement to the effect that he could not reason out the division of the yuga into Utsarpini, Apasarpini, Susamā and Dussamā, as done in Aryabhatiya, Kala, 9. After explaining text as it stands, he states : “The significance of this verse has to be made clear by the learned after deep thought. I cannot comprehend it” : 37FUTURSfana निरूप्य वक्तव्यः । अस्माभिस्तु न ज्ञायते । (p. 92 and fn.). 
Another trait of Suryadeva consists in his examining earlier writers critically. A passing remark made by him in his commentary on the Laghumānasa on Prasastidhara, an earlier commentator of the work, is instructive. Noticing that an innovation made by Prasastidhara is illogical, Suryadeva observes : 'A rationalist as I am, I cannot approve of the innovation' : इदमेव दोस्त्यंशं अपवतितत्रिज्या, प्रशस्तिधराचार्येण स्फुटग्याससंज्ञां कृत्वा स्फुटभुक्तिस्फुटविक्षेपानयनावपतितव्यासाधंस्थाने कल्पितम् । तत्तु यौक्तिका वयं न मृष्यामहे । (Com. on LMā, I. ii. 5-6a). 
Similar observations are found also in the Jātakapaddhati-vyakhya. Thus, noting the difference of views on the depiction of the lords of the year and of the month in earlier texts, Suryadeva observes : तत्र सावनाब्द मासाधिपानयनगणितस्य सूर्यसिद्धान्त-खण्डखाद्यक-पञ्चसिद्वान्तादीषक्तस्य परस्परविरोधेन निर्णतुमशक्यत्वाद 'आधवारतोऽब्दादि'रिति न्यायेन सौरयोः (? तयोः) प्रसिद्धत्वात् ताभ्यामेव व्यवहारः । (Com. on Ja. Pa., iii. 14). 
Again on the determination of the Ayana-bala, he observes : आचार्येण राशिरूपविप्रकर्षमानीय अयनबलानयनं कृतम् । श्रीधरार्येण श्रीपतिप्रोक्तमुपायमुक्त्वा कान्तिविप्रकर्षणवायनबलानयनमुक्तम । अस्मदक्तज्यारूपविप्रकर्षणवायनबलानयनोपाये अति लघुनि विद्यमाने किमर्थमाचार्याभ्यां यत्नात कृतमिति न जानीमः । (Com. on Ja. Pa., iii. 15-16). 
xlvi 
ARYABHATIYA 
On occasions, Suryadeva supplies to his commentary compen dious verses with exposition thereof, with a view to supplement the information given in the text. These verses are introduced by such expressions as : 3a qalxanvariarai Hanifayfaafacaf UTS#1974 Arnalda Trit $rua (Com. on LMā., IV. 1); Ha araftaarina 79 afqafezal u 377 atda grata sarafa i (Com. on LMā., IV. 2). 
3. Astronomical instruments and diagrams 
Sūryadeva was a practical astronomer and it is interesting to find in his commentaries descriptions of astronomical instruments for celestial and other observations and instructions for diagrammatic representations. These descriptions are to be found especially in the sections devoted to the computation of the mean and true positions of planets and the eclipses. When prescriptions disagree, Suryadeva resorts to testing through instruments, vide, for instance, his observa tion: Teata dg acoute afecttfafa: qziferati (Com. on LMā., III. 6-7) 
4. Some peculiarities 
It is interesting to find towards the close of Suryadeva's works a 
reference to his earlier writings and the indication of his future plans, a singular feature found in the works of a few Sanskrit authors. The details found herein are highly informative to the literary historian, bibliographer and text-critic. 
5. Astronomical and astrological authorities cited 
Suryadeva refers in his works, especially in the Laghumānasa vyakhya, to a large number of earlier authorities, most of whom are well known. Pộthūdakasvami (c. A. D. 860), commentator on the Brahmasphutasiddhanta and Khandakhadyaka, is referred by the abbre viated name 'Pșthusvāmi'. From among the less known works and authors on astronomy cited, may be mentioned, Acarya Lātadeva, 
1. On astronomical instruments, see his com. on Ā, Gola., 22 (pp. 143-44), 48 (pp. 182-83); and on Lma., Upodghata to ch. I. ii; II, 1, 2; III. 9, 13, 17, 18, 20; IV. 1, 6, 9. 
INTRODUCTION 
Lokaloka-ganita, Prabhākara-gaạita, Tantrapradipa of Yogi, Parahita wanita of Haridatta and Mayamata. Among the less known astrolo gical authorities cited by Suryadeva in his Jataka paddhati-vyākhyā are Śrīdhara, Maņintha, Manu, Maya, Bādarāyaṇa, Devakīrti, Satya and Krsnāditya. Several anonymous verses are also cited with one or other of the following prefixes : 'Ganitavidah', 'Pūrvācāryāh', 'Sampradaya vidaḥ' and 'Sampradāya-siddha'. 
13. YALLAYA AND HIS SUPPLEMENT TO SURYADEVA'S 
COMMENTARY 
1. Personal details 
Sorvadeva had in Yallaya, a 15th century astronomer of the 
found that Suryadeva's commentary was rather brief, even as Suryadeva himself has indicated towards its beginning. Justifying his supple mentation and indicating its scope, Yallaya states at the beginning: "Since the commentary composed by Suryadeva, a master of the science of words, is brief, the commentary of Suryadeva-Yajvan is (first) written down in entirety for each aryā-sūtra of Aryabhata which he has commented, and wherever that commentary is brief, further commen tary in supplementation thereof and alternate illustrative examples are added by me, Yallaya by name, learned, well read in many works of Pațigaạita, proficient in the three branches (of Jyotişa), possessing command over language by virtue of a boon bestowed by Lord Siva, son of Sridharărya and disciple of Sūryācārya son of Bälāditya, for the benefit of those astronomers who desire to know in detail), the meaning of the Ganita, Kālakriya and Gola padas (of the Aryabhațīya) composed by Aryabhata." 
1. Śrīdhara, author of Pārīgaạita (c. 900), is apparently different from Śrīdhara, authority on astrology, since the latter has followed Śrīpati's Jātakapaddhati (A, D. 1039), vide, Sn. 12. 2 on P. xlv, above. 
2. Cf. : riferid HITT774FS Fisca | Intro. verse 3, p. 1. 
3. Cf. : Frazetectieafar Hidaa Juga BTET TIETTAEU संक्षेपत्वात् मायंभटोक्त-गणित-कालक्रिया-गोलपादार्थान् ज्ञातुमिच्छतां दैवज्ञानामुपकाराय 
xlviii 
ARYABHATİYA 
We learn from the above that Yallaya was the son of Śrīdharārya and was a pupil of Suryācārya' son of Bălāditya. This Śrīdhara (14th 15th cent.) is, obviously, different from his namesake Sridhara (c. A.D. 900) who wrote the Patiganita and the Trisatika. Similarly, Suryācārya (14th-15th cent.) is different from Suryadeva Yajvan (b. 1191), and is the author of Ganakananda, Daivajñābharaṇa and Daivajñabhūșaņa. A closing verse of his commentary Kalpalata on the Süryasiddhānta supplies the additional information that he belonged to the Kāśyapagotra and that his grandfather's name was also Yallaya. 
Yallaya was a native of Skandasomeśvara, which lay to the south east of the renowned temple-town of Śrīśaila in the Telugu Country. He indicates in his supplementary commentary on A., iii. 6 that he composed the work at Skandasomeśvara, of which place he gives the measure of the equinoctial midday shadow as 3} angulas and the equinoctial midday hypotenuse as 1215 angulas. These measurements specify a place having a latitude of 15° 30' N. Skandasomesvara is also stated to be 36 yojanas from the Hindu prime meridian (according to the reckoning of the Suryasiddhānta which corresponds to 4° 5' to the east of the said meridian. 
यस्य यस्य सूत्रस्य सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना यद् व्याख्यानं कृतं तस्य (तस्य) आर्यासूत्रस्य तत् कृत्स्नं व्याख्यानं लिखित्वा यत्र यत्र व्याख्यानं संक्षेपं तत्र (तत्र) बहुपाटीगणितग्रन्थवित्त्रिस्कन्धार्थ विदा, श्रीमच्चन्द्रशेखरवरलब्धवाग्विभवेन, श्रीधराचार्यस्य पुत्रेण, श्री-बालादित्यसुतसूर्याचार्य शिष्येण श्री-यल्लयाख्येन विपश्चिता मया व्याख्यानमपि किञ्चिदधिकम्, उदाहरणान्तराणि 
च, क्रियते। 
1. His name is given as 'Śūryaņārya' in the colophon to Yallaya's com. Kal palatā on Laghumanasa. 
___ 2. Cf. : Yallaya's statement : मदीयदेशस्तु श्रीशैलस्य आग्नेयदिग्भागे स्थित : स्कन्दसोमेश्वराख्यपट्टणः । (Com. on Saryasiddhanta, i. 57-58). 
___3. Cf. : श्रीशैलस्य प्राग्नेयस्थित-स्कन्दसोमेश्वराख्यपट्टणे वृत्तिः (?) मया सम्यङ् निर्णीतं (?) विषुवत्प्रभा 3-20. तस्य द्वादशाङ्गुलशङ्कोः जनितामुलानि 3-20. विषुव स्कर्ण: 2-28. (Com. on A, iii. 6). 
4. f. : स्कन्दसोमेश्वरस्य सिद्धान्तमार्गोक्तषट्त्रिंशद् योजनानि । (Com. on A, iii. 6). 
INTRODUCTION 
xlix 
Earlier, in the same context, Yallaya takes the Kali year 4581 (=A.D. 1480), to demonstrate the calculations involved in computing the planets. This would mean that he wrote the work about this date. 
2. His works 
Yailaya is the author of at least five more works on mathe matics and astronomy. They are : (1) Gamita-sangraha, a treatise on arithmetic, (2) Jyotișadarpaņa,“ on astronomy, (3) Kalpaval!ī, a commentary on Suryasiddhānta and (4) Kalpalata,o an extensive commentary on the Laghumanasa of Muñjāla whom Yallaya uniformly calls by his alternative name Manjula. (5) A commentary in Telugu of the Süryasiddhanta by Yallaya has also been recorded.' 
3. Nature of the Supplementation 
Yallaya's supplementation leaves out the Gitikā-pāda and covers only thGanita, Kalakriya and Gola sections of the Aryabhatīya and 
1. Cf.: 77 #fa(T)arati: 4581 (Com. on Ā, iii. 6). 
2. For more details on Yallaya, see Pt. I, Introduction, pp. xl-xliv. 
3. Ms. No. 2879, Catalogue of Sanskrit Mss. in Mysore and Coorg, by Lewis Rice, (Bangalore, 1884), p. 318. 
4. Ms. Nos, 661, Reports on Skt. Mss. in Southern India, by E Hultzsch, (Pt. I, Madras, 1895); No. 3465, A Catal. of Skt. Mss. in the Panjab Univ. Library, Lahore, (Vol. II, Lahore, 1941). 
5. Ms. No. 6284, A Cata. of Skt. and Pkt. Mss, in the Library of the India Office, Vol. II, by A. B. Keith, (London, 1935); R. 1708, A Triennial Cata. of Mss., (Govt. Or. Mss. Lib, Madras, Vol. II, Pt, i. Sanskrit C); 11662, 11663, A Des. Cata. of the Skt. Mss. in the Tanjore Maharaja Serfoji's Sarasvati Mahal Library, (Vol. XVI, Tanjore, 1933); 673, Report on Skt. Mss. by Hultzsch, (ibid.); 336, Cata. of Skt. Mss. in Mysore and Coorg, by Lewis Rice, (ibid., p. 36). 
6. Ms. D. 13475, A Des, Cata. of the Skt. Mss. in the Govt. Or. Mss. Library, Madras, (Vol. XXIV, Madras, 1918); R. 7705, A Triennial Cata. of Mss. Sanskrit, ibid., (Vol. XI, Madras, 1958). 
7. For a Ms., see No. 6285, India Office, ibid. A Bb S. vii 
ARYABHAȚIYA 
takes the form of additional notes and worked out examples relating to mathematical computation occurring in the said three sections. Some of these examples are his own and the others culled from earlier astrono ners like Bhaskara I. His own illustrations are prefixed with expressions like madīyodāharaṇāni. The Ganita-rāda, the Sphuta section of he Kāla krijā-pada and the Grahaņa Section of the Gola-pāda are particularly rich in these extra examples. Often, additional elucidations are given to the textual verses and new topics are introduced and explained. A number of compendious verses (sangraha-ślokas) composed by Yallaya himself are also found strewn all over the Supplement. The views, explanations and examples of Yallaya's teacher Sūryācārya also come in for citation. To cite an instance : After recording Suryadeva's comment on Ā, Gaạita 11, Yallaya introduces his teacher's views with the prefatory statement : सूत्रस्य सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना कृतं व्याख्यानं समग्रमपि मदगुरुमुखारविन्दविनि गतानि वाक्यानि मयाऽऽश्रितानि कानिचिल्लिख्यन्ते। 
4. Supplementation on Conjunction of planets 
A lengthy supplement covering several pages added to Gola. 45 is highly instructive. In this supplement Yallaya works out in detail illustrative examples for the conjunction of Jupiter and Moon which occurred in Kali 4557 (A.D. 1456), of Saturn and Moon which occurred in Kali 4566 (A.D. 1465), a solar eclipse which occurred in Kali 4567 (A.D. 1466) and a lunar eclipse which occurred in Kali 4580 (1479). This excursus is interspersed with a large number of Yallaya's own summary verses and observations on the merits of different astronomical authorities. Some of the said observations are particularly interesting. Thus, on the comparative ease in the computation of parallax according to the Laghumānasa, Yallaya remarks : #tartar बहुप्रयाससाध्यजनितलम्बनस्य मञ्जुलाचार्योक्तसुलभोपायसाध्यलम्बनस्य [च] द्वितीय चविघटिकामात्रं वैषम्यम् । अर्थात् चन्द्रादुपरिकक्ष्यासञ्चारिणं गुरुं आदित्यं परिकल्प्य सूर्यास्तमयादियोगकाले तदहर्युगतघटिकापर्वान्तन्यायेन लम्बनावगतिः कुर्यात् । After further discussion he observes, a fateriaafatata strafatfag stafafa मन्ये । But on the computation of true Saturn, he remarks : आर्यभटोक्तमार्ग जनितशनिः स्थूल इति मन्यामहे । 
5. An auxiliary work 
At one place, the supplementation of Yallaya takes the form of an auxiliary work. Thus, after recording Suryadeva's commentary on 
INTRODUCTION 
A, Käla 6, Yallaya observes : 37a f19f#919/geu aidata 15aal aartată अमनमपि सर्वदा गणितव्यवहाराणां व्याख्याने व्यवहारस्य [उपकारित्वात् कालक्रियापादो पदेशभगणादीन श्लोकनिबद्धय स्फुटानयनं श्रीबालादित्यसुतसूर्याचार्य शिष्येण यल्लयाख्येन मया किञ्चिद् [उच्यते] । आदौ गुरुदेवतानमस्कारपूर्वकग्रन्थारम्भः क्रियते 
नत्वा [शिवं सूर्यगुरुं] गणेशं वाणी ग्रहानार्यभटोक्तमार्गात् । 
श्रीयल्लयाख्यः कुरुते सुवृत्तमध्यग्रहाद्यानयनप्रकारम् ॥ 
This is followed by the depiction of the plane:ary parameters, the method of computing the inean planets and allied matters and the demonstration of the computation of mean planets by an example for a date in A.D. 1480. It may be noted that it is in this context that Yallaya mentions the location of his native town of Skandasomeśvara. 
6. Weights and measures . Since a knowledge of the units of measures and weights is essential for mathematical and astronomical computations and since Süryadeva does not supply this need, Yallaya attempts to give the same in detail at the commencement of the Kalakriyā-pada. The units depicted by Yallaya relate to length, grain measure, weight, time and numerical notation upto 29 places. This is followed by a statement of the Purăņic legend on the promulgation of numerical notation and mathematical operation during a conversation between Lord Siva and Goddess Parvatī.1 
14. ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS 
The credit for undertaking the present Aryabhatīya Critical Edition Series, of which the present volume forms Part Iil, goes to the Indian National Scie ice Academy. Prof. F. C. Auluck, Vice President of the National Commission of History of Sciences in India of the Academy, and Dr. B. V. Subbarayappa, Executive Secretary of the Academy evinced keen interest in the progress of the volume at all stages and I am thankful for all the help and advice they have rendered in the preparation of this volume. 
1. It was originally intended to include Yallaya's Supplement to the present edition of Suryadeva's Commentary, but the idea had to be abandoned on account of the highly corrupt nature of the available manuscript thereof. 
lii 
ARYABHATIYA 
As indicated earlier, all the five manuscripts on which the present edition has been based were made available for collation by Dr. K. Raghavan Pillai, Director of the Kerala University Oriental Research Institute and Manuscripts Library, Trivandrum. I am highly grateful to Dr. Pillai for extending to me utmost academic cooperation for my editorial work. 
The authorities of the Panjab University, Chandigarh, kindly permitted me to be an Editor of the present series of volumes on Āryabhata. I am very much thankful to them for providing me an opportunity to associate myself in this endeavour towards placing before the scholarly world an important chapter in the development of mathematical science in India. 
The press copy of this volume had the benefit of being read by Dr. K. S. Shukla, Deptt. of Mathematics and Astronomy, Lucknow University, who offered several valuable suggestions towards its per fection. I cannot adequately express my indebtedness to Dr Shukla in the above regard. 
My thanks are due in full measure also to Prof. T.S. Kuppanna Sastri, formerly of the Presidency College, Madras, for the advice and suggestions I received from him on several matters of importance to this publication. 
I take this occasion also to record my warm appreciation of the conscientious work done by the V. V. R. Institute Press, Hoshiarpur, in the matter of the neat printing and fine get-up of this volume. 
K. V. SARMA 
आर्यभटकृतम् 
आर्यभटीयम् सूर्यदेवयज्वप्रणीत-प्रकाशिका-व्याख्योपेतम् 
व्याख्यातुरुपोद्घातः 
'नमामि परमात्मानं स्वतःसर्वार्थवेदिनम् । विद्यानामादिवक्तारं निमित्तं जगतामपि ॥१॥ नमः ___सकलकल्याणगुणसंवास भूमये । निरवद्याय नित्याय महसेऽस्तु महीयसे ॥२॥ 
त्रिस्कन्धार्थविदा सम्यक् सूर्यदेवेन यज्वना। संक्षिप्यार्यभटप्रोक्तसूत्रार्थोऽत्र प्रकाश्यते ॥३॥ 
Mss. used : A. C. 245 (= T. 24); B. 5957-B; C. C. 2320; 
D. C. 2475-A; E. C. 2121-C, all deposited in the Kerala Univ. Or. Res. Inst. and Mss. Library, Trivandrum, Kerala. 
व्याख्या-1. D. A part of the Introduction upto व्याचिख्यासितम् , (p. 5, 
__line 8, below) lost. E. omits the first intro. verse. 
3. E. Gap for त्रिस्कन्ध to संक्षिप्या, next line, but the omission 
is supplied in uninked writing by the reviser, obviously from a different ms. Short gaps and fillings of a similar nature occur elsewhere also, but they are not indicated in 
this edition unless warranted by any special reason. 
4. B. सूत्रार्थों (? र्थः) प्रत्यकाश्यते । पार्व.-1 
व्याख्यातुरुपोद्रातः 
[ ज्योतिश्शास्त्रमहिमा ] 'स्वाध्यायोऽध्येतव्यः' ( ते० प्रा० २.१५.७ ), 'स्वाध्यायमधीयते' ( मा० शतपथ-ब्राह्मणम् , ११.५.६.८ ) इत्यर्थज्ञानपर्यन्ताध्ययनविधानेन अर्थज्ञानोपायतया अर्थाभिहितस्य अङ्गाध्ययनस्य तस्माद् ब्राह्मणेन निष्कारणं षडङ्गो वेदोऽध्येतव्यः' ( महाभाष्यम् पस्पशाह्निकम् ) इति निष्कृष्य विधानात् , 
वेदाङ्गानि च सर्वाणि कृष्णपक्षे तु सम्पठेत् । इत्यङ्गाध्ययनस्य कालक्लृप्तिविधानात्,' 
छन्दः पादौ तु वेदस्य, हस्तौ कल्पोऽत्र पठ्यते । मुखं व्याकरणं प्रोक्तं,' ज्योतिषं नेत्रमुच्यते । शिक्षा प्राणस्तु वेदस्य, निरुक्तं श्रोत्रमुच्यते ॥ 
(पाणिनीयशिक्षा, ४१-४२) इत्यङ्गविशेषक्लृप्तिस्मरणेन तत्तदङ्गाध्ययनाभावे वेदपुरुषस्य तत्तदङ्गवैकल्यं भवति । तस्मात् त्रैवणिकै दवदध्येतव्यतया विहितेषु षट्स्वप्यङ्गेषु 
मुखमधु शरीरस्य सर्व वा मुखमुच्यते । 
तत्रापि नासिका श्रेष्ठा श्रेष्ठे तत्रापि चक्षुषी ॥ इति न्यायेन वेदपुरुषस्य चक्षुष्ट्वेन प्रधानाङ्गमवश्यमध्येतव्यमिति संस्मृत्यादौ भगवता ब्रह्मणा बहुविस्तरं ज्योतिश्शास्त्रं कृतम् । ब्रह्मणः सकाशादधीततच्छास्त्रो वृद्धगर्गस्तत् संक्षिप्य अन्यच्चकार । तस्मादपि लब्धतद्विद्याः 10पराशरादयो मुनयोऽप्यन्यानि ज्योतिश्शास्त्राणि चक्रुः । तथा च वृद्धगर्ग: 
स्वयं स्वयम्भुवा दृष्टं चक्षुर्भूतं द्विजन्मनाम् । वेदाङ्ग ज्योतिषं ब्रह्मसमं वेविनिस्सृतम् ॥ 
व्याख्या-1. C. E. अर्थ विहितस्य 
2. E. निष्कारणः 3. E. वेदोऽध्येयः 
4. A.C. पक्षेषु; E. gap for तु 5. E. कालविशेषस्मरणात् 6. E. कल्पोऽथ 7. E. तस्य for प्रोक्तं 8. E. तत्तदङ्गवैकल्यदोषापत्तेश्च उपनीतस्त्रवणिकैः 9. E. मध्येतव्यं ज्योतिषामयनम् । तत्र नानाशाखासु विप्रकीर्णस्य ज्योतिष 
विषयस्य वेदभागस्यार्थान् संस्मृत्यादी 10. B.C. पराशरादिमुनयो 11. B. C. विनिस्मृतम् 
ज्योतिश्शास्त्रमहिमा 
मया स्वयम्भुवः प्राप्त क्रियाकालप्रसाधकम् । वेदानामुत्तमं शास्त्रं त्रैलोक्यहितकारकम् ॥ 
तैस्तथा ऋषिभिर्भूयो ग्रन्थः स्वः स्वरुदाहृतम् ॥ 
तथा च गर्ग: 
श्रूयतां स्वर्यमायुष्यं धयं पुण्यं यशस्करम् । ज्ञानविज्ञानसम्पन्नं द्विजानां पावनं परम् ।। कालज्ञानमिदं पुण्यमाद्यं हि ज्ञानमुत्तमम् । सिसृक्षुणा पुरा वेदानेतद् दृष्टं स्वयम्भुवा ॥ वेदाङ्गमाद्यं वेदानां क्रियाणां च प्रसाधकम् । ज्योतिर्ज्ञानं द्विजेन्द्राणामतो वेद्यं विदुर्बुधाः ॥ ज्योतिश्शास्त्रं तु सर्वस्य लोकस्योक्तं शुभाशुभम् । ज्योतिर्ज्ञानं च यो वेत्ति स वेत्ति परमां गतिम् ।। तद्भावभावनायुक्तं' तं देवा ब्राह्मणं विदुः । तस्मात् पूर्वमधीयोत ज्योतिर्ज्ञानं द्विजोत्तमः ॥ धर्मशास्त्रं ततः पश्चाद् यज्ञकर्मविधिक्रियाः । तस्मात् पुण्यं समं वेदर्यज्ञचक्षुः सनातनम् ॥ स्वर्गामध्येयमव्यग्रेाह्मणः संश्रितवतः ॥ 
तथा च लगधाचार्य:10-- 
यथा शिखा मयूराणां नागानां मणयो यथा । तथा वेदाङ्गशास्त्राणां ज्योतिषं मूर्धनि स्थितम् ।। 
व्याख्या-1. B. माद्यं विज्ञानमुत्तमम् 
3. E. क्रियायां 5. E. ज्योतिश्चक्रात्तु 7. A. C. E. तद्भावभाविनं युक्तं 9. A. B. C. विधिः क्रियाः 
2. C. सृष्टं 4. E. बुधः 6. E. तु लोकस्य सर्वस्योक्तं 8. B. द्विजोत्तमः 10. A.C. यवनाचार्यः 
व्याख्यातुपोदातः 
वेवा हि यज्ञार्थमभिप्रवृत्ताः कालानुपूर्व्या विहिताश्च यज्ञाः । तस्मादिदं कालविधानशास्त्रं यो ज्योतिषं वेद स वेद यज्ञम् ॥ 
(मार्चज्योतिषम् ३५-३६; याजुषज्योतिषम् ४. ३) 
३ 
इति । 
[ ज्योतिश्शास्त्रस्य विभागः ] एतच्च गणित-जातक-शाखाख्यस्कन्धत्रयात्मकम् । तथा च वृद्धगर्गः 
गणितं जातकं शाखां यो वेत्ति द्विजपुङ्गवः । 
त्रिस्कन्धज्ञो विनिर्दिष्टः संहितापारगश्च सः ॥ इति । तत्र कालक्रियाख्यस्य ग्रहगणनादे:, गोलाख्यस्य ज्योतिश्चक्र ग्रहभ्रमण-धरित्रीसंस्थानादेश्च प्रतिपादको ज्योतिश्शास्त्रांशको गणितस्कन्धः । जननकाल-कर्मानुष्ठानकालयोरुदयलग्नादिवशाज्जातकर्मानुष्ठानादीनां शुभा. शुभप्रतिपादको होरा-जातक-काल-मुहूर्त विधानादिशब्दवाच्यांशो जातकस्कन्धः। ग्रहचारोत्पातादिवशाच्छुभाशुभप्रतिपादकः संहितास्कन्धः । एवमेतैस्त्रिभिः स्कन्धैः एकैकस्कन्धगत नानाभेदैश्च बहुधा विप्रकीर्णमिदं ज्योतिषामयनं नाम वेदपुरुषस्य प्रधानमङ्गं अवश्यमध्येतव्यमिति सिद्धम् ॥ 
[ आर्यभटीयपरिचयः ] तत्र वराहकल्पस्यास्य सप्तमे मन्वन्तरे वर्तमानाष्टाविंशच्चतुर्युगस्य कल्पादेः खखषट्वर्गमिते (३६००) सौराब्दे गते त्रयोविंशतिवर्षे प्राचार्यार्यभट: पुरातनानि कालक्रिया-गोल-लौकिकगणित-प्रतिपादकानि शास्त्राणि कालदैर्ध्या यत्तसम्प्रदायविच्छेद-ग्रन्थवैकल्यादि जनितेन दृग्गणितविसंवादेनाकिञ्चित्करा 
व्याख्या-1. E. यज्ञान । 
2. E. पारगः स्मृतः 3. E. अंशको revised to अंशो 4. C. वाचकांशो 5. E. प्रतिपादकः शाखासंहितादिशब्दवाच्योंऽश: शाखास्कन्धः । 6. E. Gap for नानाभेदैश्च विप्रकीर्णमिदं, not filled in by the 
reviser, obviously since the copy he referred to, too, did 
not contain the passage. A.B.C.D. have this passage. 7. E वर्ष: 
8. E. विप्लवादि 
मार्यभटीयपरिचयः 
- 
C 
ण्यालोच्य समदृग्गणितं ज्योतिश्शास्त्रं चिकीर्षुः तादृश ज्योतिर्ज्ञानबीजलाभाय ज्योतिश्चक्रग्रहादेरादिवक्तारं भगवन्तं स्वयम्भुवम् अमलस्तपोभिराराधयामास। ततः प्रसन्नो भगवांस्तस्मै तादृशमतीन्द्रियम् अतिरहस्यभूतं कालक्रिया-गोल ज्ञानबीजमुपदिदेश । ततोऽयमाचार्यभट स्तदुपदिष्टं सर्वं बीजभूतं दशभिर्गीति सूत्रः, तत्परिकरभूतलौकिकगणितबीजं स्वबुद्धयाभ्यूहितम् एकेनार्यासूत्रेण च' संक्षिप्य लोके प्रकाशयामास । ततोऽष्टाधिकशतैरार्यासूत्रैर्गणित-कालत्रिया-गोल बीजोपयोगं दिङ्मात्रेण दर्शयामास । तदिदमाचार्यभटमुखारविन्दनिर्गतं प्रबन्धद्वयात्मकं ज्योतिश्शास्त्रमस्माभिर्व्याचिख्यासितम् । 
तत्र त्रीणि वस्तूनि प्रतिपाद्यतया प्रतिज्ञातानि-गणितं, कालक्रिया, गोल इति। तत्र गणितं सङ्कलित-व्यवकलितादिमिश्रक-क्षेत्र श्रेढी-कुट्टाकारादि चानेकविधम् । इह तु ज्योतिश्शास्त्रप्रतिपाद्ययोः कालक्रिया-गोलयोर्या वन्मानं परिकरभूतं तावन्मानमेव सामान्यगणितं प्रतिपाद्यतया प्रतिज्ञायते। कालस्य क्रिया कालक्रिया । कालपरिच्छेदोपायभूतं ग्रहगणितं कालक्रियेत्यर्थः । ब्रह्माण्ड कटाहान्तर्वाकाशमध्यस्थं ग्रहनक्षत्रकक्ष्यात्मकं 10खमध्यस्थसमघनवृत्तभूमिकं अपक्रमाद्य शेषविशेषोपेतं प्रवहवायुप्रेरणान्नित्यं पश्चिमाभिमुखं गच्छत् स्थल जलसीमास्थानां सर्वाश्चर्यमयं कालचक्र ज्योतिश्चक्र-भपञ्जरादि"शब्द वाच्यो गोल: । स च वृत्रक्षेत्रत्वात् चतुरश्राद्यनेक क्षेत्रकल्पनाधारत्वाच्च गणितविशेषगोचर एव । एवमेतानि त्रीणि वस्तूनि व्याख्यातानि । 
एतत्त्रयमपि प्रत्येक द्विविधम्-उपदेशमात्रावसेयं, तन्मूलन्यायावसेयं चेति । तत्र एतावद् युगप्रमाणम् , एतावन्तो युगे ग्रहमन्दशीघ्रोच्चपातनक्ष 
व्याख्या-1. E. चिकीर्षन् 
2. E. तादृशं 3. E. ग्रहादेः स्रष्टारं 
4. B. रहस्यं 5. B. C. om. आचार्य 
6. E. om. आर्यभट 7. B. C. om. च 
8. D. commences from here 9. D. Gap for वन्मानं to सामान्यगणितं, next line. 10. B. C. स्वमध्यस्थ ; E. स्वखमध्यस्थ 11. C. Hapl. om. द्य[शेषविशेषोपेतं 12. D. सीमास्थानं 
13. A. B. C. कालचक्र 14. E. ग्रहा वि for भपञ्जरादि 15. D. E. वाच्यं गोलम् । 16. D. क्षेत्रफलत्वात् 
17. A.B.C. चतुरश्रक्षेत्राद्यनेक 18. E. Hapl. om. सेयं [चेति to सेयम् ।], 4 lines below. 19. C. D. तत्र तावत् 
व्याख्यातुपोदातः 
त्राणां परिवर्ताः, एतावान्मन्द परिधिः, एतावान् शीघ्रपरिधिः, एतावान् ग्रहाणां परमापक्रम:, एतावांश्चन्द्रादीनां परमविक्षेपः, एतावद् ब्रह्मदिनप्रमाणम्, तद्गत. मेतावद्, एतावती युगे योजनात्मिका ग्रहगतिः, एतावती ग्रहकक्ष्या इत्येवमादिकं वस्तुजातम् उपदेशमात्रावसेयम् । एतदुपदेशं विना प्रमाणान्तरेणावगन्तुं न शक्यते । एतस्यातीन्द्रियस्य ग्रहगतिबीजस्य निरवशेषप्रतिपादनाय दशगीति सूत्रारम्भः । 
एतावतैव कृत्स्नं गणितस्कन्ध गतमर्थजातं परिसमाप्तम् । इतोऽन्य त्सर्वं न्यायसिद्धत्वाद् बुद्धिमद्भिरभ्यूह्य प्रतिपादयितुं शक्यते। तथा हि गणिपादोक्तानि चतुरश्र-त्र्यश्रक्षेत्रादिफलानि, त्रैराशिकादीनि कुट्टाकारपर्यन्तानि च गणितानि तावल्लौकिकगणितन्यायसिद्धानि सर्वैरभ्यूहितुं शक्यन्त एव' । 
__ कालक्रियापादोक्तान्यपि तथाविधान्येव । भूदिनानि तावद् रविनक्षत्र भगणयोरुपदेशाल्लोकसिद्धेन द्वियोगन्यायेन तयोरन्तरं कृत्वा ज्ञातुं शक्यन्ते । तानि च ग्रहादिमध्यमानयने प्रमाणराशिः। युगरविमासाश्च युगरव्यब्दोपदेशाद् वर्षस्य च द्वादशमासत्वेन लोकसिद्धत्वाद, युगरव्यब्दद्वादशगुणनयैव सिद्धयन्ति। रविशशियोगस्य चान्द्रमासत्वाद् रविशशिभगणविशेष एव चान्द्रमासा भवन्ति । एकस्य चान्द्रमासस्य त्रिंशत्तिथ्यात्मकत्वेन प्रसिद्धत्वात् ते त्रिंशद्गुणिता युग तिथयः स्युः । अवमदिनस्य शशिसावन दिनान्तरत्वाद् युगसावनयुगचन्द्रदिना न्तरं युगावमदिनानि । चान्द्रसौरमासान्तरस्य अधिकमासत्वप्रसिद्धया युगाधि मासानयनमपि स्पष्टम् । एवम् एतैः परिकरभूतैरिष्टकालत्रैराशिकेन गत. सौरमासतिथिषु याताधिकावमादीनि संसाध्य गतमासतिथिषु तद्योगशोधनेन 
2. D. Gap. for [ती to मात्राव] सेयं, next line. 3. D. E. न ह्येतद् .." शक्यतेऽवगन्तुम् । 4. C. गणितग्रन्थ 
5. A.B.C. प्रतो 6. A.B. सर्वैरप्यभ्यू हितुं 7. E. शक्यन्ते । एवं 8. B. C. om. च; E. स्व for च 9. E. सिद्धाद् 10. D. Gap for द् to एकस्य, next line. 11. A. B. भगणशेष 12. D. Gap for सा [वन to सौरमा]सान्तरस्य, one line below. 13. D. Gap for *[tifarra uta 14. D. E. कावमानि ___ 15. D. om. गतमासतिथिषु 
आर्यभटीयपरिचयः 
कलियातदिनानि ज्ञातुं शक्यन्ते। तानि च इच्छाराशिः । फलराशिश्च इष्टग्रहादेर्युगभगणाः। एवमेतैस्त्रैराशिकगणितेन ग्रहमध्यमा:1 सिध्यन्ति । उच्चमध्यमे ग्रहमध्यमे च ज्ञाते उच्चमध्यमसमो ग्रहह्मध्यम एव स्फुट: । तयोः कक्ष्यामण्डलस्थोच्च नीच रेखाया: परमविश्लेषो राशित्रयम् । तत्रत्येन मध्यम स्फुटान्तरेण व्यासार्धन निष्पन्नाः पठिता: परिधयः । इष्टकालग्रहोच्चान्तरस्य 
राशिकेन तात्कालिकमध्यमस्फूटान्तरमानीय मध्यमग्रहतत्संयोगवियोगाभ्यामेव पारमार्थिकग्रहसिद्धिः । तथा शीघ्रोच्चोपदेशो येषामस्ति ते शीघ्रोच्च स्वान्तरोत्पन्नेन फलेनापि संस्कृता: पारमार्थिका भवन्ति । इत्येतान्यन्यानि च कालक्रियापादोक्तानि अर्थजातानि सर्वाण्युपदेशमूलन्यायावसेयान्येव । 
तथा गोलपादोक्तान्यपि तथाविधान्येव । तथा हि-स्थलजलसीमायां लङ्कामधिकृत्यापक्रमोपदेशात् पूर्वापराया उत्तरेण दक्षिणेन चापक्रान्तं किञ्चिदुन्मण्डलमस्तीति शक्यं कल्पयितुम् । अपमण्डलात् प्रभृति विक्षेपोपदेशात् तदुत्तरतो दक्षिणतश्च स्थितं किञ्चिन्मण्डलमस्तीत्यपि' शक्यं कल्पयितुम् । एवमन्यान्यपि गोलपादोक्तान्यर्थजातानि बीजोपदेशवत् सुतरां न्यायपथमधिरोहन्ति । 
एवमेतदुपदेशसहितन्यायावसेयं वस्तु सुहृद्भावेन प्रदर्शयितुं प्राष्टि शतनिबद्धस्य गणित-कालक्रिया-गोलपादात्मकस्य प्रबन्धस्य प्रारम्भ इत्यादीन्यनुसन्धेयानि । एवम् उपोद्घातं प्रदर्श्य शास्त्रं व्याख्यायते ।। 
[ इत्युपोद्घातः।] 
व्याख्या-1. D. E. ग्रहादिमध्यमाः 
3. B. C. संस्थोच्च 5. D. Gap for मधि 7. A. B. C. मस्तीति 
2. A. B. C. मध्य for मध्यम 4. E. Hapl. om. of ata 6. E. om. तत् 8. A, B. C. निबन्धस्य 
अथ गीतिकापादः 
[ मङ्गलाचरणम् ] अथ प्राचार्यभटो दशगीति मारभमाण: तद्विघ्नोपशान्तये भगवते स्वयम्भुवे प्रणामं कृत्वा तत्प्रतिपाद्यानि वस्तूनि आर्यया निर्दिशति 
प्रणिपत्यैकमनेकं के सत्यां देवतां परं ब्रह्म । 
आर्यभटस्त्रीणि गदति मणितं कालक्रियां गोलम् ॥१॥ 
कारणरूपेणक, कार्यरूपेणानेकम् । सत्यां देवताम्-देव एव देवता । सत्य: पारमार्थिकः । स्वयम्भूरेव पारमार्थिको देवः। अन्ये देवास्तत्सृज्यत्वेन अपारमार्थिकाः। परं ब्रह्म जगतो मूलकारणम् । एवंभूतं कं स्वयम्भुवं प्रणिपत्य आर्यभटस्त्रीणि गदति ब्रवीति । 'रामो द्विर्नाभिभाषते', (रामायणम् २.१६.१९), 'कौटिल्येन कृतं शास्त्रम्' (अर्थशास्त्रम् , १. १. १९) इतिवद् आत्मन एवायं परोक्षरूपेण निर्देश: । प्रारभ्यमाणस्य' सिद्धान्तस्य स्वायम्भुवत्वात् , तदारा धनलब्धत्वाच्च तत्सिद्धान्तरहस्यानां, तत्प्रणामः कृतः । कानि पुनस्तानि त्रीणीत्याह'-गणितं, कालक्रियां, गोलमिति । एतानि पूर्वमेव व्याख्यातानि । (पश्य पृ० ५-७) । गणितविशेषत्वेन गणितशब्दगृहीतयोरपि कालक्रिया गोलयोः पृथगुपादानं तयो:10 शास्त्रे" प्रधानप्रतिपाद्यत्वज्ञापनार्थम् । अत एव 
व्याख्या-1. B. तथा 
2. E. गीतिसूत्र 3. A. B. C. रम्भमाण 4. C. सत्यं पारमार्थिकम् ; DGap for स[त्यः to देवास्तत्सृज्यत्वेन, 
just below. 5. D. Gap for [ afor to affeéta ) two lines below; E. TUFU 6. A. प्रारम्भमाण ; D. E. आरभ्यमाण 7. E. om, FT 
8. C. om. तानि 9. D. tr. पुनस्त्रीणि तानीत्याह 10. B. C. द्वयोः 11. E. शास्त्र 
श्लोकः २ ] 
संख्याविन्यासे परिभाषा 
तयोर्दश गीतिकासूत्रेण कृत्स्नं बीजमुपदिष्टम् । न्यायमार्गश्च कालक्रिया-गोलपादा भ्यामशेषतो दर्शितः । तत्परिक रत्वादेव गणितस्य वीजतो न्यायतश्च ज्याोप देशसूत्रेण गणितपादेन' च यावदपेक्षं अभिधानमित्यवगन्तव्यम् । बीजोपदेशेनैव वस्तुत्रयाभिधानस्य परिसमाप्तत्वात् तत्प्रतिपादकप्रबन्धारम्भ एव तदभि धानप्रतिज्ञा च संगच्छत इति ॥१॥ 
[ संख्याविन्यासे परिभाषा ] . 
अथ युगभगणादिसंख्योपदेशं संक्षेपेण करिष्यन् आद्येन गीतिसूत्रेण सदुपयोगिनीं परिभाषामाह 
वर्गाक्षराणि वर्गेऽवर्गेऽवर्गाक्षराणि कात् ङ्मौ यः। 
खद्विनवके स्वरा नव वर्गेऽवगें नवान्त्यवर्गे वा ॥२॥ 
___ गीतिसूत्राणि अविभक्तिकनिर्देशबाहुल्यात् पदविभागं प्रदर्श्य व्याख्या यन्ते–वर्गाक्षराणि, वर्ग, अवर्ग, अवर्गाक्षराणि, कात् , इमो, यः, खद्विनवके, स्वराः, नव, वर्गे, अवर्गे, नवान्त्यवर्गे, वा। 
ककारादीनि मकारपर्यन्तानि पञ्चविंशति: वर्गाक्षराणि । यकारादीनि हकारपर्यन्तानि अष्टौ अवर्गाक्षराणि । संख्याविन्यासस्थानेषु विषमस्थानानि वर्गसंज्ञानि । समस्थानानि प्रवर्गसंज्ञानि । ततोऽयमर्थः5-वक्ष्यमाणेषु गीतिसूत्रेषु यानि संख्याप्रतिपादकानि वर्गाक्षराणि तानि विषमस्थाने स्थापयितव्यानि । यानि चावर्गाक्षराणि तानि समे। वर्गावर्गाक्षरप्रतिपादिता संख्या विषमसमयोः स्थानयोः स्थापयितव्येत्यर्थः । तैः प्रतिपादिता संख्या यदा नवातिरिक्ता' भवति तदा स्वस्मिन् स्वोपरिस्थाने च स्थापयितव्या, दशादिसंख्याया द्विस्थानस्थिति - स्वभावत्वात् । कात् वर्गाक्षराणां संख्या ककारात्प्रभृत्यवगन्तव्या । ककारमारभ्य 
ध्याख्या--1. E. om. दश 
2. C. मुपसृष्टम् 3. B. adds here सूत्रेण; A.B.C. omit च following. 4. E. Hapl. om. वर्गसंज्ञानि, [समस्थानानि अवर्गसंज्ञानि । ] 5. D. तत्रायमर्थः 
6. B. om. प्रतिपादिता 7. E. नवसंख्यातिरिक्ता 8. C. om. भवति 
9. B.C. om. स्थिति भार्य--२ 
गीतिकापादे 
[ गीतिका 
यावती संख्या प्रयुक्तस्य' वर्गाक्षरस्य मातृकापाठक्रमेण परिगृह्यते सा संख्या वर्गाक्षरस्येत्यर्थः । तत्र ककार: प्रथमाक्षरत्वात् संख्याविशेषवचनाच्च एक संख्यः, खकारो द्विसंख्य इत्यादिक्रमेण मकारः पञ्चविंशतिसंख्यो भवति । 
ननु वर्गाक्षराणां स्वरूपवत् ककारादित्वस्यापि लोकसिद्धत्वात् 'कात्' इत्येतदनर्थकम् । न। वर्गाक्षराणां संख्याप्रतिपादने कटपादित्वं, नत्रयोश्च शून्य त्वमपि प्रसिद्धम् । तन्निरासार्थं 'काद'ग्रहणम् । कात्प्रभृत्येव वर्गा क्षराणां संख्या, न टकरात् पकरात् च प्रभति । कात् प्रभृति सर्वाणि संख्यां प्रतिपादयन्ति, न तु अकार-नकारयोश्च शून्यत्वमित्यर्थः । 
अवर्गाक्षराणां तु लोकेऽपि यकारस्यैवादित्वात् तदादित्वनियमस्य प्रयोजनाभावाद् यकारादित्वं नोक्तम् । किन्तु तेषामपि लोकप्रसिद्धिवशेने कादिका संख्या प्राप्ता । तदपवादार्थमाह-मौ यः ङकारमकाराभ्यां संहत्योक्तेन प्रकारेण या संख्या प्रतिपाद्यते सा यकारस्य संख्या" । तत्र डकारः पञ्चसंख्यः, मकारः पञ्चविंशतिसंख्यः। तयोर्योगस्त्रिशत्संख्यः। तेन वर्ग स्थानापेक्षया त्रिंशत्संख्यो यकारः, स्वस्थानापेक्षया त्रिसंख्यः। एवं यकारस्य त्रित्वविधानात् तदुत्तरेषां रेफादीनां चतुरादिसंख्यत्वं सिद्धम् । तेन रेफश्चतु स्संख्यः, लकारः पञ्चसंख्यः इत्याद्यवगन्तव्यम् । 
ननु म इत्यनेन यदि यकारस्य त्रिसंख्यत्वमुच्यते, तहि 'गो य:' इति वक्तव्यम् , गसंख्यो यकारः। यथा गकारः स्वस्थाने त्रिसंख्यः, एवं यकारोऽपि स्वस्थाने त्रिसंख्य इत्यर्थः। तत् किमर्थं 'ङ्मौ यः' इत्यधिकोक्ति रिति । उच्यते-संयुक्तैरपि वर्गावर्गाक्षरै: संख्या प्रतिपादयिष्यत इत्येतज्ज्ञा पयितुं ङ्म इति ग्रहणं वेदितव्यम् । 
ध्याख्या-1. Gap for [स्य to वर्गाक्षर]स्येत्यर्थः, next line ; E. प्रयुक्ता 
2. E. परिगण्यते 
3. B.C. स्येत्यवगन्तव्यः 4. E. विशेषावचनाच्च 5. D. Gap for [ इत्यादि to ननु वर्गाक्षराणां] स्वरूपवत् , next 
line. 6. B. C. add here मकारपर्यन्ताः 7. D. Gap for शून्य 
8. E. नकार-अकारयोश्च 9. A. B. C. नियमस्याप्रयोजनाद् 10. B. C. प्रसिद्धनकादिका 11. B. कारमकारयोः या संख्या ; C. कारमकारयोः संहत्या या संख्या सा 
पकारस्य संख्या । 
श्लोक: २] 
संख्याविन्यासपरिभाषा 
११ 
एवं वर्गावर्गाक्षराणां संख्याऽभिहिता। सा च सर्वेषु वर्गावर्गस्थानेषु युगपत् प्राप्ता। तन्नियमार्थमाह-खद्विनवके स्वरा नव वर्ग:वर्ग। खानि शून्यो पलक्षितानि संख्याविन्यासस्थानानि, तेषाम् , द्वे नवके खद्विनवके । तस्मिन् खद्विनवके, शून्योपलक्षितस्थानाष्टादशके इत्यर्थः । स्वरा नव नवसंख्या अच:, अ इ उ ऋ ल ए ऐ ओ औ इति व्याकरणशास्त्रसिद्धा: स्थाप्याः । कथमष्टा. दशसु स्थानेषु नव स्वराः स्थापयितुं शक्यन्ते ? तवाह-वर्गेऽवर्ग इति । अत्र स्थानाष्टादशके अोजानि नव स्थानानि वर्गाख्यानि, युग्मानि नव प्रवर्गाख्या नी'त्युक्तम् । तेषु प्रथमवर्गस्थानात् प्रभृति प्रथमादिस्वरा: क्रमेण स्थाप्याः । एवं प्रथमाऽवर्गस्थानात् प्रभृति च त एव स्थाप्याः। एतदुक्तं भवति-यदा वर्गाक्षरं प्रथमस्वरयुक्तं तदा प्रथमे वर्गस्थाने वर्गाक्षरसंख्या स्थाप्या। यदा त्ववर्गाक्षरं तत्स्वर युक्तं तदा प्रथमेऽ'वर्गस्थानेऽवर्गाक्षरसंख्या स्थाप्या। एवं द्वितीयस्वरसंयुक्तं यदा वर्गाक्षरमवर्गाक्षरं च, तदा द्वितीये वर्गेऽवर्गे च क्रमेण स्थाप्या । अनेन क्रमेण नवमस्वरयुक्तं नवमे वर्गेऽवर्गे च क्रमेण स्थापनीयम्। 
आकारादयोऽपि स्वरा अकारादिवदेव ज्ञेयाः । 
एवमष्टादशसु स्थानेषु संख्याप्रतिपादनोपायःप्रदर्शित: । यदा पुनस्त दधिकस्थानप्रापिणी संख्या कस्यचिद्विवक्षिता भवति तदा कथं कर्तव्यमित्य नाही-नवान्त्यवर्गे वा । नवानामन्तो नवान्तः। तत्र भवो नवान्त्यः । नवान्त्ये वर्गस्थाने । वर्गग्रहणमवर्गस्याप्युपलक्षणम् । नवमस्थानसमीपस्थे दशमे वर्गस्थानेऽवर्गस्थाने च त एव स्वरा: स्थाप्याः। वा शब्दो विकल्पार्थः । विकल्पश्च प्रकारः । केनचित् प्रकारेणोपलक्षिताः स्वरा: प्रयोक्तव्याः । 
व्याख्या-1. E. संख्या विहिता 2. D. E. खद्विनवकम् 
3. C. om. इत्यर्थः 4. A. B. C. प्रवर्गस्थानानी 5. D. Gap for [च to यदा वर्गाक्षरं], next line. 6. C. om. स्वर 7. D. Gap for वर्ग to एवं द्वितीय, next line. 8. B. C. om. क्रमेण 9. D. om. स्थाप्या 10. B. C. स्थाप्यम् 11. A. B. C. योज्याः ; E. om. the word. 12. E. कर्तव्यम् । तत्राह 13. C. तत्प्रभवो 14. E. om. स्था[ने च to विकल्पश्च], next line. 
गीतिकापावे 
गीतिका 
तद्यथा-यद्यकार: प्रथमेऽष्टादशके शुद्धः प्रयुक्तः स द्वितीयेऽष्टादशके प्रथम वर्गावर्गयोरनुस्वारादियुक्तः प्रयोक्तव्य:, कं, खं, यं, रं' इति । एवं द्वितीयवर्गा वर्गादिष्विकारादयोऽप्य नुस्वारा दियुक्ताः प्रयोक्तव्याः। एवं तृतीयाष्टादशके अन्यदुपलक्षणं कर्तव्यम् । एवं यावदिच्छं 'अन्यदन्यदुपलक्षणं कृत्वा संख्यो पदेष्टव्या । एतच्च संख्याविवक्षूणामनुग्रहायोपदिष्टम् । शास्त्रव्यवहारस्तु अवर्गावर्गस्थानान्नातिवर्तते । एवमिदं प्रथमं गीतिसूत्रं व्याख्यातम् ॥२॥ 
[ प्रहाणां युगभगणा: ] द्वितीयेन गीतिसूत्रेण रव्यादीनां युगभगणानुपदिशति 
युगरविभगणाः ख्युघृ, शशि चयगियिङशुल, कु डिशिबुएलष्ख, प्राक् । शनि डुबिध्व, गुरु स्त्रि च्युभ, कुज भलिझनुख, भृगुबुधसौराः॥३॥ 
अस्य पदानि-युगरविभगणाः, ख्युध, शशि, चयगियिशुछल, कु, डिशिबुलुख, प्राक् , शनि, डुविध्व, गुरु, खिच्युभ, कुज, भलिझनु , भगुबुधसौराः । 
युगं वक्ष्यति 'समार्कसमे'त्यत्र (गीतिका ७)। तस्मिन् युगे रवेरर्कस्य भगणाः परिवर्ता: ख्युघृ-संख्याः। अत्र खकारयकारयो"रुकारेण तृतीयस्वरेण योगात् तृतीयवर्गावर्गयोः स्थापनम् । तत्रापि खकारस्य वर्गाक्षरस्य द्वितीयसंख्यत्वाद् वर्गस्थाने12 आदित: पञ्चमे द्विकं स्थाप्यम् । यकारस्य 
व्याख्या-1. A. B. C. D. कं, खि, यं, रि 2. C. om, अपि 
3. E. तृतीयेऽष्टादशके 4. A. B. C. Hapl, om. one अन्यत् ; D. Gap for दन्यदुप 5. E. adds इति 
6. B. C. D. om, गीति 7. D. om. व्याख्यातम् 
8. A. adds here इतस्तु 9. C. om. the para haplographically. 10. A. B. C. om. अत्र 
11. D.E. यकारखकारयो 12. C. E. तृतीयवर्गस्थाने 
6. 
B. 
श्लोकः३] 
प्रहाणां युगमगणाः 
अवर्गाक्षरत्वादवर्गस्थाने आदितः षष्ठे त्रीणि । कारस्य चतुर्थस्वरयुक्तस्य वर्गाक्षरत्वात् चतुर्थे वर्गस्थाने आदितस्सप्तमे चत्वारि । ततो 'दस्राग्निसागरा भानोरयुतघ्नाः' ( लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.9) इत्युक्ता रविभगणा जाताः (43,20,000). 
शशि चयगियिङशुछल । युगभगणशब्दावनुवर्तते । शशिनो युगभगणा श्चयादयः । चकारस्य वर्गाक्षरत्वात् प्रथमस्वरयोगाच्च प्रथमे वर्गस्थाने षट् । यकारस्य तत्स्वरयोगाद् अवर्गाक्षरत्वाच्च प्रथमेऽवर्गस्थाने आदितो द्वितीये त्रीणि। गकारस्य द्वितीयस्वरयुक्तस्य वर्गाक्षरत्वाद् द्वितीये वर्गस्थाने आदितस्तृतीये त्रीणि । यकारस्यापि तद्युक्तत्वाद् द्वितीयेऽवर्ग स्थाने" आदितश्चतुर्थे त्रीणि । डु इत्यस्य' वर्गाक्षरस्य तृतीयस्वरयोगात् तृतीये वर्गस्थाने आदितः पञ्चमे पञ्च । शु इत्यस्यावर्गाक्षरस्यापि तद्योगात् तावत्यवर्ग स्थाने" आदितः षष्ठे सप्त। छ्ल इत्यनयो"वर्गावर्गाक्षरयोश्चतुर्थस्वरयोगा 1"च्चतुर्थयोर्वर्गावर्गस्थान योरादितस्सप्तमाष्टमयोः क्रमात् सप्तकं पञ्चक च स्थाप्यम् । ततश्शशिभगणा 'अङ्गपुष्कररामाग्निशरशैलादिसायकाः' (लघुभास्करीयम्, 1.9) जाताः (5,77,53,336). 
कु डिशिबुण्लष्त । कोभूमेर्युगभगणाः पूर्ववज्जाता: 'खाम्बरेष्वद्रि 
व्याख्या-1. A. B. C. शब्दोऽनुवर्तते 2. D. चन्द्रस्य परिवर्तकाः for चयादयः 
3. C. D. प्रथमवर्गस्थाने 4. C. प्रथमावर्गस्थाने ; D. अवर्गस्थाने प्रथमे ; E. om. अवर्गस्थाने 5. C. द्वितीयावर्ग 
6. D. E. tr. अवर्गस्थाने द्वितीये 7. B. C. ङकारस्य 
8. B.C. om. अवर्गाक्षरस्यापि 9. D. तत्स्वरयोगात् 10. D. तृतीयेऽवर्गस्थाने 11. B. C. add छकारलकारयोः 12. E. च्च चतुर्थ 13. D. E. om. स्थान 14. D. E. स्थापनीयम् 15. D. In place of पूर्ववज्जाताः, D. reads : इत्यनुवर्तते । डि इत्यस्य 
वर्गाक्षरत्वाद् द्वितीयस्वरयोगाच्च आदितस्तृतीये पञ्च । शि इत्यस्यावर्गा क्षरत्वाद् द्वितीयस्वरयोगाच्च द्वितीयावर्गस्थाने आदितश्चतुर्थे सप्त । बु इत्यस्य वर्गाक्षरत्वात् तृतीयस्वरयोगाच्च तृतीये वर्गस्थाने प्रादित: पञ्चमे त्रयोविंशः । ण्ल इत्यस्य णकारस्य वर्गाक्षरत्वात् पञ्चमस्वरयोगाच्च पञ्चमे वर्गस्थाने आदितो नवमे पञ्चदश । ख इत्यनयोर्वर्गावर्गाक्षरयोश्चतुर्थ स्वरयोगाच्चतुर्थयोर्वर्गावर्गयोः स्थाने प्रादितः सप्तमाष्टमयो. क्रमाद् द्विकम्, अष्टकं च स्थापनीयम्। 
गीतिकापादे 
[ पीतिका 
रामाश्वियमाष्टतिथयो भुवः'1 (1,58,22,37,500). नन्वचलाया भूमेः कथं भगणोपदेश: ? उच्यते-भचक्रस्थानि प्रत्यङमुखानि नक्षत्राणि भचक्रस्य प्रवहाक्षेपवशाद परां दिशं गच्छन्ति, स्वाधःस्थितां भूमि स्वगत्या प्राङ्मुखं भ्रमन्तीमिव पश्यन्ति । यथा परं पारं प्रति यान्तीं नावमधिरूढा: पुरुषा नौगमनवशात् परं पारं प्रति यान्तस्तमेव परं पारं स्वप्रतिमुखं यान्तमिव पश्यन्ति, अनया दृष्टया भचक्रस्यैव परिवर्त भूमावध्यस्य भगणोपदेशः कृतः । प्राक् स्वगत्या प्राङ्मुखं गच्छता ग्रहादीनां तद्गमनकृता: परिवर्ता भगणा इत्युपदिश्यन्ते। 
ननु सर्वाणि ग्रहनक्षत्राणि पूर्व' पूर्वस्यां दिश्युदयं कृत्वा क्रमेणाम्बर मध्यमतीत्य पश्चिमस्यां दिश्यस्तं यान्तीति दृश्यन्ते । अतो नक्षत्राणामिव ग्रहाणामपि प्रत्यङ्मुखमेव गमनं, न तु प्राङ्मुखमिति । "उच्यते-नक्षत्राणि तावद् भचक्रे पूर्वापर स्थितानि, अश्विन्या: पूर्वतो" भरणी, तत्पूर्वत: कृत्तिका, तत्पूर्वतो रोहिणीत्यादि । एतानि भचक्रे प्रतिबद्धानि तद्भ्रमणवशान्नित्यं पश्चिमाभिमुखं गच्छन्ति । भचक्रस्थानां ग्रहाणामपि नक्षत्राणामिव यदि चक्राधीना गतिरेव स्यात् , तवेंकस्मिन् काले अश्विन्यां दृष्टास्तत्परतो बहुतिथेऽपि काले गते भरण्यादिभिस्सह नोपलभ्येरन् । उपलभ्यन्ते च ग्रहा अश्विन्यादिभिः सह पूर्वस्मिन् काले दृष्टा: परस्मिन् काले धरण्यादिभिः सह पूर्वपूर्वस्थितैः। तस्माच्चक्रगतिव्यतिरिक्तं स्वकीयं गमनं प्राङ्मुखम"स्तीति निश्चीयते। तेन प्राङ्मुखेन गमनेन य एकश्चक्रपरिवर्त: स एको भगणः । 
व्याख्या-1. D. adds इति भूमेर्युगभगणा जाताः । 
2. C. प्रवहक्षेपणवशात् 3. D. For अपरां, D. reads : नित्यं पश्चिमां 4. D. E. नावमारूढाः 5. E. तया for अनया 
6. D. परिवर्तितं ; E. परिवर्तनं 7. E. Hapl. om. of पूर्व ___8. E. om. तु 9. C. adds अत्र 
10. D. पूर्वापरं 11. D. परतो (wrong). 12. D. भचक्रबद्धानि ; E. भचक्रप्रतिबद्धानि 13. D. चक्राधीनैव गतिः स्यात् ; E. om. एव in गतिरेव 14. B. C. om. अपि 15. C. पूर्व दृष्टाः 16. A. B. C. स्वकीयगमनं 17. D. Tr. प्राङ्मुखं गमनं 
श्लोकः ३ ] 
पहाणां युगमगणार 
१५ एवमेकस्मिन् युगे यावन्तो ग्रहाणां' भगणाः त इहोपदिश्यन्ते । प्राग्भगण त्वैकवाक्यतयैव भचक्रस्य प्रत्यग्भगणाः भूमावध्यस्योपदिष्टा इत्यव गन्तव्यम् । 
शनि शनेः। युगभगणा इति सर्वत्रानुवर्तते । डु-वि-ध्व । 'शनेरपि च वेदाङ्गभूतषट्कसुराधिपाः' (146,564), (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.11). 
गुरु गुरोः युगभगणाः नि-च्यु-भ । 'सागराश्वियमाम्भोधिरसरामा गुरोः स्मृताः (364,224) (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.10). 
कुज कुजस्य भगणा: भ-दिल-झ्नु-ख । 'कौजा वेदाश्विवस्वङ्गनवदस्रयमाः स्मृताः' (22,96,824), (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.10). 
भगुबुध भृगु'बुधयोर्युगभगणाः । सौराः सूर्यस्येमे सौराः । सूर्यस्य यावन्तो भगणा' उपदिष्टास्तावन्त एव बुधशुक्रयोरपि भगणा: प्रत्येक मित्यर्थः । 
एवमनेन गीतिसूत्रेण रव्यादीनां ग्रहाणां भुवश्च भगणा उपदिष्टाः । एते चोपदेश सिद्धा एव, नात्र युक्तिः क्रमत" इत्युक्तम् । एवं द्वितीयं गीतिसूत्रं व्याख्यातम् ॥ ३ ॥ 
व्याख्या--1. A. B. C. om. ग्रहाणां 2. A. B. C. प्राग्भ्रमण 
3. C. om. एव 
4. B. adds इति जाताः 5. B. प्रकीर्तिताः । इति गुरोः स्मृता इव (?); D. वेदाम्बराश्विवेदाङ्गरामाः 
प्रकीर्तिताः (364204), the fig. being different. 6. B. C. om. भगणाः ; D. E. युगभगणाः 7. B. Hapl. om. : बुध[योः 'to बुध] शुक्रयोः, next line. 8. D. सूर्यस्योक्ता 9. D. E. युगभगणा 10. C. om. भगणाः ; D. E. युगभगणाः 11. B. om. क्रमत 12. B. C. E. एवमिदं ; D. om. एवं 13. D. om. the word. 
गौतिकापावे 
[ गीतिका० 
[ चन्द्रोच्चभगणादिः ] तृतीयेन गीतिसूत्रेण चन्द्राधुच्च-चन्द्रपातानां भगणान् भगणारम्भ कालं' चोपदिशति 
चन्द्रोच्च त्रुष्खिध, बुध सुगुशिथून, भृगु जपविखुछु, शेषााः । बुफिनच पातविलोमा बुधाइन्यजाऊदयाच्च लङ्कायाम् ॥ ४ ॥ 
अस्य सूत्रस्य पदानि-चन्द्रोच्च, त्रुष्खिध, बुध, सुगुशिथून, भृगु, जषबिखुछ, शेष, आर्काः बुफिनच, पातविलोमा:, बुधाह्नि, अजाऊदयात् , च, लङ्कायाम् । 
त्रिपाद्यां 'युगभगणा' इति शब्द: सम्बध्यते । चन्द्रोच्च चन्द्रोच्चस्य युगभगणा: 'त्रुष्खिध । 'इन्दूच्चस्य नवैकाश्विवसुप्रकृतिसागराः' (4,88,219), (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1. 12) एतच्च चन्द्रान्मन्दगतित्वान्मन्दोच्चम् । बुध, उच्चपदं पूर्ववदनु वर्तनीयम्, बुधोच्चस्य युगभगणाः 'सुगुशिथन' । 'बौधाः खाश्विखसप्ताग्निरन्ध्रशैल निशाकराः' (1,79,37,020), (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1. 12). भृगु भृगूच्चस्य युगभगणाः जबिखुछु, 'भार्गवस्याष्टवस्वग्नि यमदस्राम्बरादयः' (70,22,388), (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.13). शेषं शेषाणां कुजगुरुशनीनाम् , उच्चस्य युगभगणा आर्काः, अर्कस्येमे आर्काः, आदित्ययुग भगणा एव । 'ख्युघृ'संख्याः शेषाणां त्रयाणां उच्चभगणा इत्यर्थः । एतानि बुधादीनां प्रतिपादितान्युच्चानि' तत्तद्ग्रहाच्छीघ्रगतित्वाच्छीघ्रोच्चानि । अत्र शेषग्रहेष्वादित्यो न गण्यते, तद्भगणस्यैवोच्चभगणत्वातिदेशात् , तथा च सर्वदा केन्द्रस्य शून्यत्वप्रसङ्गाच्च । 
बुफिनच पातविलोमाः कुजादिपातानां वक्ष्यमाणत्वात् रवेविक्षेपोपदेशा ऽभावेन पाताऽनुपयोगाच्च चन्द्रस्यैवायं पातः । तस्य चन्द्रपातस्य विलोमा 
मूलम्- 1. D. E. जु for , व्याख्या-1. D. कालादिकं 
2. D. E. M for ज. 3. D. युगभगणशब्दः ; E. युगभगणः, and om. इति शब्दः 4. E. र्जु 
5. C. एते च ; E. om. 6. E. पूर्वार्धेऽनु (wr.). 7. B. C. उपचभगणानि 
श्लोकः ४ ] 
चन्द्रोच्चभगणाविः 
.१७ 
भगणाः चक्रगतिव्यतिरिक्ततया' प्रत्यङ्मुखस्वगत्या निष्पन्ना इमे युगे परिवर्ता: बुफिनच 'अङ्गाश्वियमदस्राग्नियमला: पातपर्ययाः (2,32,226) - (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.14). मीनान्तोपक्रमो मेषादिपर्यवसान एक: परिवर्तः । 
ननु सप्तैव ग्रहा व्योम्नि भ्रमन्तो दृश्यन्ते। तेषां च भगणा: पूर्वमेवोपदिष्टाः। क एते उच्चपाताः येषामत्र भगणोपदेशः क्रियते ? उच्यते--तेषामेव ग्रहाणां स्फुटगत्यादिपरिज्ञानोपायभूताः केचन संख्या विशेषाः' । नैषां व्योम्नि दर्शनमस्ति । तथा च ब्रह्मगुप्त: 
.. प्रतिपादनार्थमुच्चं प्रकल्पितं ग्रहगतेस्तथा पाताः। 
(ब्राह्मस्फुटसिद्धान्तः, 21.30) इति । 
__ एते ग्रहोच्चपातभगणा: कस्मिन् देशे कस्य दिनवारे' कस्मात्कालात् कस्माच्च भचक्रप्रदेशादारभ्य प्रवृत्ता इत्येतन्न ज्ञायते । तत्प्रदर्शनार्थमाह बुधायजाऊदयाच्च लङ्कायाम् । बुधाह्नि इति दिनवारः। अजो मेषादिर्भचक्र प्रदेशः । अर्कोदय इति काल: । लङ्कायामिति देश: । तेन मीनमेषसन्धिस्थितस्य मध्यमार्कस्य लङ्कास्थाना"मुदयादारभ्य स्वासु कक्ष्यासु मेषादे: प्राङ्मुखेन स्वगमनेन स्वस्वभगणान् भोक्तुं कृतयुगादिबुधवारे प्रवृत्ता रव्यादयो ग्रहाः । अत्रानन्तरातीतकृतयुगादिमभिप्रेत्य बुधवार इत्युक्तम् । अन्यत् सर्वं कृतयुगो प्रक्रमसाधारणम्, वारमात्रं तु भिद्यते। तच्चोत्तरत्र प्रतिपादयिष्यामः13 । एवमिदं तृतीयं गीति सूत्रम् ॥ ४ ॥ 
--- 
- 
- 
- 
- 
- 
-- 
- 
व्याख्या-1. E. व्यतिरिक्तया 2. D. प्रत्यङ्मुख्या गत्या 
3. D. tr. पातपर्ययाः to before बुफिनच 4. C. adds इति 
5. C. एषां 6. C. कृतः 
7. D. विशेषभूताः 8. D. Gap for भगणा: to दिनवारे, just following. 9. C. कस्य वा दिने 10. D. Gap for बुधा to मेषादिर्भ, following. 11. C. लङ्कास्थात् ; D. E. लङ्कायां स्थितानां 12. C. E. स्वासु स्वासु 13. E. adds इति 14. D. om. इदं ___15. D. om. गीति 
भार्य.-३ 
गीतिकापादे 
[ गीतिका 
[ ग्रहाणां कल्पभगणाः ] कल्पप्रमाणं तद्गतं च चतुर्थेन गीतिसूत्रेणोपदिशति--- 
काहो मनवो ढ', मनुयु ग श्ख, गतास्ते च, मनुयुग छना च । कल्पादोर्युगपादा 
ग च गुरुदिवसाच्च भारतात् पूर्वम् ॥ ५ ॥ अस्य पदानि-काहः, मनवः, ढ', मनुयुग, श्ख, गताः, ते, च, मनुयुग, छना, च, कल्पादेः, युगपादाः, ग, च, गुरुदिवसात् , च, भारतात , पूर्वम् । 
___ कस्याहः मनवो ढ। चतुर्दश मनवः । एकस्मिन् ब्रह्मदिने चतुर्दश मनवः क्रमेण राजानो भवन्ति। मनुयुग' श्ख एकस्मिन् मनौ युगानि द्वासप्ततिः । द्वासप्ततियुगान्येकैकस्य मनोः प्रमाणमित्यर्थः। एवं युगानां अष्टोत्तरं सहस्रं कल्पसंज्ञितं ब्रह्मणे दिवसमित्युक्तं भवति । 
एवं कल्पप्रमाणमभिधाय तद्गतमाह-गतास्ते च, वर्तमानेऽस्मिन् कल्पे ते मनवः च षड् गताः। मनुयुग छ्ना च वर्तमाने सप्तमे मनौ युग छ्ना च" सप्तविंशतियुगानि च गतानि । युगपादा ग च, वर्तमाने अष्टाविंशेऽस्मिन् युगे एकस्य युगस्य युगचतुर्भागास्त्रयो गताः कृत-त्रेता-द्वापराख्याः। कल्पादेः एतानि मन्वादीनि वर्तमानकल्पस्य आदिमारभ्य भारताद् गुरुदिवसाच्च पूर्व गतानि । अष्टाविंशस्य युगस्य तृतीयपादान्तिमं गुरुदिवसमूरीकृत्य तच्च तुर्थपादात् कलियुगात् पूर्वं गतानि । 'भारताद् गुरुदिवसा दिति ल्यब्लोपे पञ्चमी। भारतवंशजाता युधिष्ठिरादयो भारताः। तैरुपलक्षितो द्वापरा 
मूलम्- 1. D. ढः 
2. C. D. E. युगा ___ 3. C. D. युगा ध्याख्या-1. D. ढः 
2. C. D. युगाः 3. C. D. युगा: 
4. D. ढः, rev. to d. 5. B. C. om. मनवः 6. B.C. ब्रह्मदिवसे 7. C. D. मनुयुगाः 8. D. मनुयुगा: 9. D. युगाः 
10. D. E. om. च 11. A. om. अष्टाविंशे 12. D. adds युगस्य चत्वारो भागा: सन्ति । तेषां त्रयो याताः। 
श्लोकः ५ ] 
प्रहाणां कल्पमगणाः तिमो गुरुदिवसो भारतो गुरुदिवसः । तस्मिन् गुरुदिवसे' हि युधिष्ठिरादयो राज्यमुत्सृज्य महाप्रस्थानं गता इति प्रसिद्धम् । तेन द्वापरान्तिमं भारत' गुरुदिवसमन्त्यावधित्वेन स्वीकृत्य कल्पादिमारभ्य कलेः पूर्वम् एतानि गतानीत्यर्थः । 
___ अथ कल्पादिमारभ्य कलियुगात् पूर्वं गतानि रविसावनदिनान्यानी यन्ते । तद्यथा-एकस्मिन् मनौ द्वासप्ततियुगानि । तानि अतीतमनुभिष्षड् भिर्गुणयित्वा जातानि युगानि 'द्वयग्न्यब्धयः' (432) । एतानि सप्तमे मनौ व्यतीतैस्सप्तविंशतिभिर्युगैस्समेतानि 'नवशरवेदाः'1 (459)। एते युगरवि सावनैः 'व्योमशून्यशराद्रीन्दुरन्ध्रायद्रिशरेन्दु'भिः (लघुभास्करीयम् , 1.14) ( 1,57,79,17,500 ) गुणिताः 'व्योमशून्यशरयमाग्निचन्द्रवेदरसा श्विवेद यमपर्वताः' (7,24,26,41,32,500 )13 कल्पादिमारभ्य वर्तमानकृतयुगादेः प्राग् गता रविसावनदिवसाः। एषु सप्तविभक्तेषु शिष्टाः षट् । अत्र वर्तमानकृतयुगादिदिनस्य बुधवारत्वोपदेशात् तत्पूर्वस्मात् कुजात् प्रभृत्युत्क्रमेण षष्ठो गुरुः कल्पादिदिनस्याधिपतिरिति निश्चीयते । तेन कल्पादिभूतकृत युगादिभूत"दिवसाधिपतिर्गुरुः । द्वितीयकृतयुगादिभूतदिनाधिपतिस्तस्मात् व्याख्या-1. D. om. गुरुदिवसे ; E. तस्मिन्नहनि, om. हि 
2. C. पन्थानं 
3. B. om. इति प्रसिद्धम्; D.E. प्रसिद्धिः '4. D. om. भारतः ; E. भारतं 5. B. कलियुगात् 
6. B. Hapl. om. [ पूर्व ... to कलियुगात् पूर्व ] गतानि, next line. 7. D. Gap for तद्यथा 8. C. D. गुणित्वा 9. Sometimes the mss, add the figures. When they are not 
so added they are supplied in the edition editorially. 10. D. E. व्यतिक्रान्तः 11. D. 'नवाद्विवेदाः 479' rev. to 'नवेषुवेदाः 459' 12. D. Gap for एते to साव, following. E. ते for एते 13. C. Gap for '32500'. 14. D. एतेषु 15. C. शिष्टं ; D. om. the word. 16. B. om. तेन 17. A. C. om. भूत 18. D. दिवस 
२० 
गीतिकापावे 
गीतिका षष्ठः कुजः, युगसावनदिवसे' सप्तविभक्ते शेषस्य पञ्चसंख्यत्वात् । एवं तृतीये तस्मात् षष्ठो रविः । चतुर्थे तस्मात् षष्ठो भृगु रित्यादि द्रष्टव्यम् । ततो युगपादत्रयभूदिनान्येतानि 'भूतसूर्याष्टरामाब्धिरामाष्टेशमितानि वै" (1,18,34,38,125) पूर्वेषु संयोज्य लब्ध: कल्पादेः प्रभृति कलियुगात्प्राग तीतः सावन दिनगणः 'शराश्विषट्खाद्रिशराद्रिवेदकृतेषुयुग्मस्वरसम्मितः स्यात्' (7,25,44,75,70,625). तस्मिन् सप्तविभक्ते शेषमेकम् । तच्च गुरोदिनम् । द्वापरान्तिमदिवसस्य गुरुवारत्ववचनादपि कल्पादौ गुरुवारः' । वर्तमानकलियुगादिदिवसः शुक्रवारः । तेन कलियुगाद्यहर्गणे शुक्रात् प्रभृति वारगणना, अनन्तरयुगाद्यहर्गणे बुधात् प्रभृति, कल्पाद्यहर्गणे गुरोः प्रभृतीति विवेकोऽनुसन्धेय इति । एवं चतुर्थं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥ ५ ॥ 
[ कक्ष्यायोजनप्रमाणम् ] पञ्चमेन गीतिसूत्रेण आकाशकक्ष्यायोजनप्रमाणं ग्रहनक्षत्रकक्ष्यायोजन प्रमाणं च राश्यादिविभागोपदेशपूर्वकं उपदिशति 
शशि राशयष्ठ चक्र, तेंऽशकलायोजनानि य-व-अ-गुणाः । प्राणेनैति कलां में, 
खयुगांशे ग्रहजवो, भवांशेकः ॥६॥ अस्य पदानि-शशि, राशयः, , चक्रं, ते, अंशकलायोजनानि, यवगुणाः, प्राणेन, एति, कला, भं, ख, युगांशे, ग्रहजवः, भवांशे, अर्कः । 
शशिशब्देन शशिभगणा" उच्यन्ते । ते राशयः कर्तव्याः। ४ द्वादश । चक्रं भगणः । एको भगणो द्वादश राशय इत्यर्थः । तस्माच्छशिभगणा द्वादश 
व्याख्या-1. D. E. दिने 
2. B. गुरु for भृगु 3. D. E. भूतसूर्याष्टरामाब्धिवह्निवसुरुद्रसंख्यानि 4. D. E. दिवसगणः 5. D. E. अस्मात् 6. D. E. शिष्टमेकम् 7. B. C. Hapl. om. [ वारः to शुक्रवारः । ] तेन, next line. 8. D. om. एवं 
9. D. om. गीतिसूत्रम् 10. E. पूर्व 
11. D. E. शशियुगभगणाः 12. D. E. add शशिभगणाः 13. C. Gap for ठ 
श्लोक: ६ ] 
कक्ष्यायोजनप्रमाणम् 
गुणिता राशयो भवन्ति । ते अंशकलायोजनानि यवत्रगुणाः । ते राशयो यवत्रैः क्रमाद् गुणिता अंशकलायोजनानि भवन्ति । एतदुक्तं भवति--राशयो यगुणाः त्रिंशद्गुणिता भागा भवन्ति । भागा' वगुणाः षष्टिगुणाः कला भवन्ति । कला अगुणा दशगुणा योजनानि भवन्ति । एवंकृते स्वकक्ष्यायोजनानि भवन्ति' । 'शून्याम्बराकाशरसस्वरेषुशून्याश्विशैलाब्धिनगाब्धिसूर्य' संख्यानि' (1,24,74,72,05,76,000) भवन्ति । स्वकक्ष्या नाम अण्ड"कटाहा वच्छिन्नस्य सूर्यरश्मिव्याप्तस्य आकाशस्य परिधिः । न ह्यनन्तस्या काशस्योपाधि विना परिमाणं सम्भवति । चन्द्रकक्ष्यायामेकैकस्याः कलाया दश योजनत्वेन सुकरत्वाच्चन्द्रभगणैरेवाकाशकक्ष्योपदेशः कृतः । कलाया दशयोजनपरिमितत्वमेव चन्द्रकक्ष्याया असाधारणम् । कलान्तो विभागस्सर्वभगणसाधारणः । तेन सर्वग्रहाणामेकस्मिन् भगणे द्वादश राशयः, षष्टिशतत्रयं भागाः, खखषड्यनसंख्याः (2,16,00) कला इत्य वगन्तव्यम् । 
प्राणेनैति कला भम् । प्राणेन उच्छ्वासतुल्येन कालेन भं ज्योतिश्चक्र कलामेति कलापरिमितप्रदेशं प्रवहवायुना पश्चिमाभिमुखं गच्छति । ज्योति श्चक्रस्य खखषड्घन (2,16,00) कलापरिमितत्वं अनन्तरमेव प्रदर्शितम् । अत्र तावत् प्राणसंख्यत्वं तद्भ्रमणकालस्योच्यते। ज्योतिश्चक्रकलास्तद् 
व्याख्या-1. D. Gap for एतदुक्तम् 2. C. D. E. गुणा 
3. C. om. Hafra 
4. C. ते for भागाः 5. B. C. add एतदुक्तं भवति 6. D. Gap for एवं to भवन्ति, next line. 7. E. Hapl. om. : भवन्ति । [शून्या to भवन्ति], below. 8. D. reads the number as : आकाश खाकाशरसस्वरेषुस्ताक्ष्यदिवेदाद्रि 
qulfaguf:, the figure being the same. 9. B. C. D. एतत्संख्यानि । 10. D. om. भवन्ति 11. D. ब्रह्माण्ड 12. C. Hapl. om. : काशस्य [परिघि to काशस्यो]पाधि विना, next 
line. 13. D. E. add अन्यः-. 14. D. E. प्रवहवायुवशात् 15. D. adds एवम् 
16. D. E. अत्र तु तावत् 
२२ 
गीतिकापावे 
[ गीतिका 
भ्रमणप्राणाश्च तुल्यसंख्या इत्यर्थः । तस्माच्छायाद्यानयने संख्यासाम्येन प्राणेष्वेव ज्यादिकं कर्म प्रवर्तते। 
खयुगांशे। ख इत्यनेनानन्तरप्रदर्शिता खकक्ष्याभिधीयते । युगशब्देन युगभगणाः । खस्य युगांशः खयुगांशः। तस्मिन् खयुगांशे । प्रहजवः जवो वेगो गतिरित्यर्थः। एतदुक्तं भवति-खकक्ष्यायाः स्वःस्वैर्युगभगणैर्भागे हते यावन्ति योजनानि लभ्यन्ते तावद्योजनपरिमितेषु समवृत्तपरिधिषु सर्वे ग्रहा: प्राङ्मुखेन स्वगमनेन गच्छन्तीति । भवांशेऽर्कः भस्य नक्षत्रकक्ष्याया वांशे षष्टयंशे, अर्कः अर्ककक्ष्या । अर्ककक्ष्यायाः पूर्वमेवोपदिष्टत्वान्नक्षत्रकक्ष्यैवा भिधीयते । अर्ककक्ष्या षष्टिगुणा नक्षत्रकक्ष्येत्युक्तं भवति । अत्र च' ग्रहाणां योजनात्मिकाया गतेस्समत्वमुपर्यधोऽवस्थानक्रमो राश्यादिगतेर्वैषम्यं चोपदिष्टं भवति इत्यनुसन्धेयम् । एवमिदं पञ्चमं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥ ६ ॥ 
[भूम्यावेर्योजनप्रमाणम् ] षष्ठेन गीतिसूत्रेण योजनपरिमाणं, भूम्यादीनां योजनव्यासप्रमाणं चोपदिशति 
नृषि योजनं, जिला भू व्यासोऽन्द्वोर्घिना', गिण, क मेरोः । भृगु-गुरु-बुध-शनि-भौमाः 
• शशि-ङ-अ-ण-न-मांशकाः समासमाः ॥७॥ 
अस्य पदानि-नृषि, योजनं, जिला, भूख्यासः, अर्कन्द्वोः, घ्रिना, गिण, क, मेरोः, भृगुगुरुबुधशनिभौमाः, शशि-ङ-अ-ण-न-मांशकाः, समा, अर्कसमाः । 
पुरुषाप्रमाणं वक्ष्यति ‘स्चाङ्गुलो घहस्तो ना' (गीति० 8) इति । नृणां षि पुरुषणाम् अष्टौ सहस्राणि अस्मिश्छास्त्रे योजनशब्देनोच्यन्ते। जिला 
मूलम्- 1. E. ध्रिन व्याख्या-1. B. Hapl. om. of समवृत्तपरिधिषु 
2. B. यत्र for प्रत्रच 3. D. merely reads पञ्चमम् । 4. B. adds उपरि 5. D. Gap for इति to अष्टो, next line. 
T 
श्लोक: ७ 
भूम्पादेयोजनप्रमाणम् 
भूव्यासः पञ्चाशदधिकं योजनसहस्रं भूमेस: । अर्केन्द्रोः, व्यास 'इत्यनुवर्तते। घ्रिना चतुस्सहस्राणि दशोत्तरचतुश्शताधिकानि अर्कबिम्बव्यासः । गिण पञ्चदशोत्तरं शतत्रयं योजनानां चन्द्रबिम्बव्यासः। क मेरोः एक योजनं व्यासः। अत्र भूम्यादीनां व्यासमात्रोपदेशात् तद्विम्बानां घनगोलाकारत्वमव सीयते। वर्तुलाकारत्वे हि व्यासप्रमाणं वर्तुलघनप्रमाणं च वक्तव्यं स्यात। न चोक्तम् । तेन घनगोलाकारा एव भूम्यादयः । भृगु-गुरु-बुध-शनि-भौमाः भग्वादीनां बिम्बानां योजनव्यासा: क्रमेण शशि-ड-त्र-ण-न-मांशकाः शशिबिम्ब योजनव्यासस्य डांशः पञ्चमांशो भृगोबिम्बस्य योजनव्यासः, ञांशो दशमांशो गुरोः, णांशः पञ्चदशांशो बुधस्य, नांश: विंशतिभाग: शनेः, मांश: पञ्चविंश तिभागोऽङ्गारकस्य योजनव्यास: । 
- अत्र चन्द्रसूर्ययोः स्वस्वकक्ष्योत्पन्नान्येव बिम्बव्यासयोजनानि, भृग्वादीनां तु चन्द्रकक्ष्योत्पन्नान्येव बिम्बव्यासयोजनानीति दृक्संवादात् सम्प्रदायाविच्छेदाच्चावगच्छामः । तेन चन्द्रकक्ष्यायामेते एतादृशा उप लभ्यन्ते इत्यर्थः । 
समार्कसमाः । समा वर्ष युगसम्बन्धि अर्कसमा अर्कभगणसमाः युगार्क भगणप्रमाणमेव, युगरविवर्षप्रमाणमित्यर्थः । एतेन युगरविभगणाः 'मनुयुग श्ख' (गीति० 5) इत्यादिषु निर्दिष्टस्य युगस्य प्रमाणमुक्तमित्यवगन्तव्यम् । एवमिदं षष्ठं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥७॥ 
व्याख्या-1. D. Gap for [इत्यनु to दशो]तर, next line. 
2. E. adds योजनानि 3. D. om. च 
4. E. पञ्चदशभागो 
5. D. E. भौमस्य for अङ्गारकस्य 6. D. E. add पञ्चानां 7. The mss. do not read these verse-colophons uniformly. 
Thus : A. E. read it as printed ; B.C. as एवमिदं षष्ठम् , and D. merely as 45541 These variations, being of a minor character, are not recorded hereafter, unless required for some specific reason. 
- गीतिकापादे 
[ गीतिका 
[ ग्रहापक्रमः ] सप्तमेन गीतिसूत्रेण ग्रहाणां विषुवत उत्तरेण दक्षिणेन चाफ्यान प्रमाणं चन्द्रादीनां विक्षेपप्रमाणं पुरुषप्रमाणं च उपदिशति 
भापक्रमो ग्रहांशाः शशिविक्षेपोऽपमण्डलात् झार्धम् । शनि-गुरु-कुज ख-क-गाध, 
भगु-बुध ख, सूचाङ्गुलों घहस्तो ना ॥८॥ अस्य पदानि-भ, अपक्रमः, प्रह, अंशाः, शशिविक्षेपः, अपमण्डलात्, माध, शनि-गुरु-कुज, ख-क-गाधं, भृगु-बुध', ख, सूचाङ्गुलः, घहस्तः, ना। 
भ चतुर्विंशतिः । अपक्रमः अपयानम् । ग्रह ग्रहाणां रव्यादीनां सप्तानाम् । अंशा भागाः । लङ्कामधिकृत्योपदेशप्रवृत्तेः तत्समपूर्वापरेणोपर्यधोभावेन स्थिताद् वृत्तादुत्तरतो दक्षिणतश्च चतुर्विशति भागान् सूर्यादयो ग्रहा अपयान्तीत्यर्थः । स्थलजलसीमात उत्तरतो मनुष्यावस्थानाच्चक्रस्थ पूर्वार्ध उत्तरतोऽपयानम , उत्तरार्धे दक्षिणतोऽपयानं ज्ञेयम् । एवं' विक्षेपस्यापि पातात्प्रभृति दिक् ज्ञेया। 
शशि शशिनः, विक्षेपः अपमण्डलाद् अपक्रममण्डलात् झार्ध, झ नव, तदर्धं झार्धम् । अंशा इत्यनुवर्तते । अपक्रम मण्डलादुत्तरतो दक्षिणतश्चार्धपञ्चम भागाश्चन्द्रस्य विप्रकर्ष" इत्यर्थः । शनि-गुरु-कुज शनि-गुरु-कुजानां ख-क-गार्धम्, 
- 
- 
- 
मूलम्- 1. B. बुधभृगु 
2. B. खचाङ्गुलो व्याख्या-1. A. D. transfer सप्तमेन गीतिसूत्रेण to after विक्षेपप्रमाणं 
2. A.C. D. E. Hapl. om. of चन्द्रादीनां विक्षेपप्रमाणं 3. B. Hapl. om. of the entire paragraph. 4. C. बुध-भगु (vide text var. in B.). 5. A. E. उत्तरेण 6. D. स्थानं 7. B. C. om. एवं 
8. B. C. Hapl. om. of झार्थ 9. A. om. क्रम 
10. B. om. स्य 11. B. C. विक्षेप for विप्रकर्ष; D. Gap for वि[प्रकर्ष to खकगार्धम् ], 
below. 12. E. transposes शनिगुरु to सार्थो भागः to after the mention 
about भुग and qष, viz. भृगु to विक्षेपः, following. 
२५ 
श्लोकः ८ 
प्रहाणामपक्रमः 
अपमण्डलाद् विक्षेपांशा इत्यनुवर्तते । शने: ख द्वौ भागौ विक्षेपः, गुरोः क एको भाग , कुजस्य गार्धं सा! भागः । भृगु-बुध ख । पूर्ववदनुवृत्तिः। 'बुधशुक्रयोद्वौं द्वौ भागौ अपमण्डलाद् विक्षेपः । अत्र शशिनः, शन्यादीनां, भृगुबुधयोश्च पृथग् ग्रहणं तत्तद्विक्षेपानयने प्रकारभेदसूचनार्थम् । स चोत्तरत्र वक्ष्यते । 
पत्तव्यः । अनेनैव ज्ञायते हस्तप्रमाणं चतुर्विशतिरङ्गुलय' इति । अङ्गुलस्य परिमाणानुपदेशाल्लोकप्रसिद्धमेव पुरुषपाण्यङ्गुलं गृह्यते। यथा चतुर्विंश त्यगुलयो [हस्तः, तदर्धम् ] अरनिस्तदर्ध प्रादेश इति क्लुप्तिरिति । अत्र तक्षकशास्त्र सिद्धाङ्गुलपरिमाणग्रहणे तु पुरुषस्य चतुर्हस्तत्वं न संगच्छते, तस्य तद्वत्परिमाणेन द्विहस्तत्वात् । अनियतं च योजनप्रमाणं प्राप्नोति । अगुलस्य अष्टसप्तषड्यवत्वविकल्पाभिधानात् । न च देशान्तरलम्बनादिपरिकरभूतस्य योजनप्रमाणस्यानियतत्वं युक्तम् । तस्मात् शुद्ध लोक सिद्धमेवाङ्गुल-हस्त पुरुषाणां प्रमाणमिति । एवमिदं सप्तमं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥८॥ 
[पातमन्दोच्चभागा: ] बुधादीनां पञ्चानां पातभागान् ससूर्याणां तेषां मन्दोच्चभागां श्चाष्टमेन गीतिसूत्रेणोपदिशति 
बुध-गु-कुज-गुरु-शनि न-व र-ष-हा' गत्वांशकान् प्रथमपाताः । 
सवितुरमीषां च तथा द्वा-अखि-सा-हदा-हल्य-खिच्य मन्दोच्चम् ॥६॥ 
- 
-- 
- 
- - 
- 
- 
----- 
मूलम् -- 1. D. E. रषाह for रषहा 2. D. ह्द for ह्दा व्याख्या- 1. D. Gap for [बुध to भागौ] अपमण्डलाद् । 
. 2. E. प्रतिवक्तव्यः 
3. E. om. एव 4. B.C. चतुर्विशतिरङ्गलम् 5. E. लोकसिद्ध 6. A. B. C. D. E. om. हस्तः, तदर्ध 7. D. तक्षशास्त्र 
8. D. E. विकल्पनाभिधामात् 9. D. E. om. the word. 10. D. मन्दोच्चांशांश्च 
11. D. om. गीतिसूत्रेण भार्य०-४ 
गौतिकापादे 
[ गीतिका 
अस्य पदानि-बुध-भृगु-कुज-गुरु-शनि न-व-र-ष-हा', गत्वा, अंशकान्, प्रथम पाता:, सवितुः, अमीषां, च, तथा, द्वा-अखि-सा-दा-हल्य-खिच्य, मन्दोच्चम् । 
बुधादीनां प्रथमपाता: मेषादितः प्रभृति न-व-र-ष-हांशकान् गत्वा व्यवस्थिताः । तत्र बुधस्य पातो मेषादितः प्रभृति न विंशति भागान् गत्वा स्थितः । भृगोः पातो व षष्टि भागान् गत्वा, कुजस्य र चत्वारिंशद्भागान्, गुरोः ष अशीति भागान्, शनेः ह शतं भागान् । एवं च विक्षेपमण्डलेनापमण्डलस्य सम्पातद्वयमस्ति । तयोरेकः पातो मेषादेः प्रभृति पठितभागे भवति । द्वितीय पातस्तस्मात् षडाश्यन्तरित इति सिद्धम् । 'प्रथम'पातग्रहणं तस्मात्प्रभृत्युत्त रतो विक्षेपः, द्वितीयाद्दक्षिणत इत्यस्य विशेषस्य' ज्ञापनार्थम् । अन्यथा 'एक:' पात इति वक्तव्यं स्यात् । 
सवितुः प्रादित्यस्य अमीषां बधादीनां पञ्चानां च क्रमेण, मन्वोच्च मन्दोच्चानि द्वा-अखि-सा-हद-हल्य-खिच्य-भागान् ,10 मेषादितः प्रभूत्येव गत्वा स्थितानि । तत्र सवितुर्मन्दोच्चं द्वा अष्टसप्तति भागान्, मेषादितः प्रभृति गत्वा स्थितम् । बुधस्य अखि दशोत्तरशतद्वयं भागान्, भृगोः सा नवति भागान् कुजस्य हुदा अष्टादशोत्तरशतं भागान्, गुरोः इल्य साशीतिशतं भागान्, शनेः खिच्य शतद्वयं षतिश दुत्तरं भागान् गत्वा स्थितम् । गत्वेत्यनेन तेषामपि 
गतिरस्तीति सूचितम् । चतुर्युगेनाप्येषां 1गतेर्मनागपि वैषम्याभावाद् भगणानुपदेशः । तथापि सम्प्रदायाऽविच्छेदार्थमुपदिश्यते 
खाकाशाष्टकृतद्विद्विव्योमेष्वद्रीषुवह्नयः । युगं बुधादिपातानां विद्भिः परिपठ्यते ॥ 
व्याख्या - 1. E. रषाह for रषहा 2. D. ह्द for ढ्दा 
3. B. Hapl. dupl. of [व्यवस्थिताः to गत्वा स्थितः], just below; ___and om. of it from the next sentence : भूगोः to भागान् 4. E. चत्वारिंशतं भागान् 5. C. षा for ष 6. D. E. add गत्वा स्थिताः 7. E. विशेषणस्य 
8. D. om. च 
9. D. हूद for हूदा 10. B. C. द्वारखीत्याधुक्तभागान् । 11. D. हूद for हुदा 12. D. अशीत्युत्तरशतं 13. E. Gap for विश 14. D. E. एषामपि 15. D. Gap for गते to भगणानुपदेशः 
श्लोक: ९] 
पातमन्वोच्चमागा 
एकद्वित्रिचतुष्पञ्च भगणाः परिकीर्तिताः । 
सौम्यारशुक्रजीवार्किपातानां क्रमशो युगे ॥ इति अनेन त्रैराशिकेनानीता यथापठिता भागा' एव । तथा उच्चयुगं तद्भगणाश्च षण्णां प्रदर्श्यन्ते - 
रव्युच्चस्य रसैकाब्धि गिर्यष्टिनवशङ्कराः। सहस्रघ्ना युगं प्रोक्तं भगणाश्च त्रयोदश ॥ दन्तवस्वन्धि रामाग्निवसुरामयमा युगम् । बुधोच्चस्य शतघ्नं स्यात् सप्तात्र भगणाः स्मृताः ।। खखाब्धिवेदनन्दाब्धिय नन्दाद्रयो युगम् । कवेः 'सूरेस्तबधं स्यादेकस्तद्भगणस्तयोः । व्योमाम्बरशून्यकृताश्वि रुद्रशरशैलवसुमुनीन्दुसमाः । 
असितोच्चयुगं कौज द्विगुणं भगणा नवेषवस्तु तयोः ॥' इति । एतैस्त्रैराशिकेनानीतानि कल्पादेर्युगपादत्रयान्ते लब्धानि मन्दोच्चानि पठितानीति । 
ननु बुधादीनां पञ्चानां पूर्व मेवोच्चान्युक्तानि । "सत्यम् । ताराग्रहाणा मुच्चद्वयमस्ति, मन्दोच्चं शीघ्रोच्चं चेति । पूर्वं शीघ्रोच्चानि प्रदर्शितानि, अत्र मन्दोच्चानि। सूर्येन्द्वोर्मन्दोच्चमेवेति विवेकोऽत्रानुसन्धेय इति। एवमिदं 
अष्टमं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥९॥ व्याख्या- 1. D. पठितभागा 
2. A.B.C.D. प्रदर्श्यते 3. Mss. wrongly read रसकाङ्क 4. Mss. actually read वस्वश्वि (wr.) 5. Mss. actually read पञ्चाष्टिवेद for नन्दाब्धित्रय 6. E. भृगो: for कवेः 7. D. देकस्मिन् भगणस्तयोः ; E. देकस्तस्मिन् गुणस्तयोः 8. Mss. garfoa (wr.) 9. These verses have been quoted by Parameśvara in his 
_Bhatadipika on the Aryabhatiya (Edn. H. Kern, Leiden, 
1874, p. 14) under this verse. See also Bhaskara's ____Bhāsya on this verse. 10. B. C. तत्सत्यम् 
गीतिकापावे 
[ गीतिका 
[ मन्द-शीनोच्चवृत्तानि ] नवमेन गीतिसूत्रेण मन्दशीघ्रोच्चवृत्तान्युपदिशति 
झार्धानि मन्दवृत्तं शशिनश्छ ग छ घ ढ छ म यथोक्तेभ्यः । झ' ग्ड ग्ल भल: दुड तथा 
शनि-गुरु-कुज-भूग-बुधोच्चशीनेभ्यः ॥१०॥ 
अस्य पदानि-झार्षानि, मन्ववृत्तं, शशिनः, छ, ग, छ, घ, हु, छ, स, यथो. क्तेभ्यः, झ', ग्ड, ग्ल, इल, दड, तथा, शनि-गुरु-कुज-भृग-बुध, उच्चशीघ्रभ्यः । 
अनोपदिश्यमानानि मन्दशीघ्र वृत्तानि झार्धानि । झ नव, तदर्धानि । अर्धपञ्चमसंख्यया अपवयं पठचन्त इत्यर्थः । मन्दवृत्तं मन्दस्फुटमध्यग्रहयोर न्तरालानयनसाधनभूतं, तयोः परमेण विप्रकर्षेण भागात्मकेन व्यासान कृतं वृत्तम् । शशिनश्चन्द्रस्य छ सप्त झार्धानि । यथोक्तेभ्यः यथोक्तानां पूर्वसूत्रे मन्दोच्चोपदेशार्थ उपात्तानां सवितृ-बुध-भृगु-कुज-गुरु-शनीनां क्रमेण मन्द वृत्तानि झार्धानि गादीनि । सवितुः ग त्रीणि, बुधस्य छ सप्त, भृगोः घ चत्वारि, कुजस्य ढ चतुर्दश, गुरोः छ सप्त, शनेः झ नव । तथा शन्यादीनां क्रमेण उच्चशीघ्रभ्यः । उच्चशीघ्रशब्देन शीघ्रफलमुच्यते । शीघ्रफलानयनाथ शीघ्रपरमफल भागव्यासार्धन कल्पितानि वृत्तानि झादीनि । तत्र शनेः झ नव झार्धानि । गुरोः ग्ड षोडश", कुजस्य ग्ल त्रिपञ्चाशत् , भृगोः इल एकोनषष्टिः, बुधस्य दड एकत्रिंशत् झार्धानीति । एवमिदं नवमं गीतिसूत्रम् ॥१०॥ 
2. C. D. ग्ला 
मूलम्- 1. C. झा 
3. D. र्द्ध for इल व्याख्या- 1. C. E. झा for झ 
3. D. x for इल 5. D. उक्तानां 7. E. भाग for फल 9. D. E. add #reffa 11. D. x for इल 
2. C. D. 1891 for ret 4. E. om. मन्दशीघ्र 6. D. Gap for शीघ्र to व्यासाधन 8. E. व्यासार्ध 10. D. E. add wreifa 

